Do you think that the motive of Obama’s plan may be more political than economic? Does this effort seem to be one which will make a legitimate difference or simply a way to appeal to voters in an election year?
His reply:
"No." The nurse says. "There is nothing to be done. He asked me to call you. He is fine. We know what it is, but we just want to make sure there is nothing else." The nurse asks me to call back in an hour. I drink mugwort and peppermint tea and watch a documentary on George Harrison.
This year I have been particularly fortunate in receiving an unusually
Black pepper, 1/2 teaspoon, crushed
Since it was Friday, I'd planned to roast a chicken (that way, we can enjoy sandwiches and salad all weekend). Most cooks have a basic recipe for chicken. It's the little black dress of poultry: classic, versatile, and works for all menus and occasions. Roasted chicken can be dressed up or down--the accessories are endless, down-home vegetables or exotic ingredients.
Mickey Mantle - Independence Yankees
Some new people have moved into our ward and have begun sitting in our seats (both in the chapel and in our Sunday School room). I have personally taken offense to this, so today we got to church 45 minutes before the meeting began. We got our seats. (The other people didn't show up at all - I showed them!) I know that the flow of the ward was once again in balance and harmony because we were sitting in our rightful seats.
Malty. You can also smell the hops, but the malt is the most apparent.
$3.00/1 – LEGO Mack’s Team Truck Building Set, Target Coupon
Jihadis are actively working to take them away and replace our guaranteed rights with the law of Allah (Shari'a). Luckily for the blind multiculturalists who think their own culture is evil, others are busy protecting their liberty and equality for them at the moment.
"I have a scratch on my leg and it FREAKIN'OUCHES!"
1 fresh date, (remove stone) or 1 tsp honey
STIR IT INTO A BALL AND REMOVE FROM HEAT
Then he was walking toward me.
I have a lot of questions. I have a lot of concerns. My son is 17 years old and I sometimes wonder about his future in America as a young black man. Two years ago, soon after he started at his new school I had reason to be alarmed. You can read that story here, if you wish.
My heart that blossoms of the earth
Whether we're in the blooming of our spring-like days or transitioning in the solstice of our fall or winter, it's still appropriate to live in full color and live it out loud. Winter, Spring, Summer, Fall...all very different, all very colorful, all very whimsical in their own way. Each season giving off it's own feeling and texture to the life it brings. These seasons bring forth a tapestry that weaves into our daily lives and brings forth a beautiful pattern with its very own color wheel...we are so intricately diverse and complex, yet with each diversity and complexity comes a beauty that is simply outstanding!
A softer hit of citrus flavours than Absolut, a sweetness comes through with hints of Limonchello aromas following. A mellow beginning on the tongue turns into a heavy dose of lemon, but not enough to ruin the palate.
Heir of Novron (Wintertide & Percepliquis)
Some may be shocked that I have never taken Kathrynn camping before...... Believe me, I've been waiting patiently for the experience! And I also decided that I knew it had to be when Kathrynn was truly interested and ready. :)
“The boys: We were in Jodhpur, the “blue city of Rajasthan”. From there a half-day trip to several very small rural villages was offered (called “Guda Bishnoi village safari”). Each village, consisting of not more than 3-5 huts each, produces something different. They are all organised, so one village produces for example carpets, the inhabitants of the other produce clay pottery, in one village the woman are knitting etc. Adjacent to one of the villages there was a group of boys playing cricket on a field. When they saw us foreigners, they ran over and asked a lot of questions (where we come from, what’s our names etc). It was a small conversation and we told them, that in our country we don’t know much about cricket. We asked for a picture of the team and they were very proud and happy to see themselves on our camera”.
“The Dark Knight Rises” will be the final movie with both writer / director Christopher Nolan and oscar-winner Christian Bale in the bat-costume. But old favourites will return with Gary Oldman as Jim Gordan, Sir Michael Caine as Alfred and Liam Neeson as Ra’s Al Ghul.
Pleasant words are like a honeycomb,
I spent an hour two tinkering around to make this page.
It would be useless to try now to impose upon my narrative more order than there was in my life.
For killing us, we are just the convenient punch bags for publicity. We try to remember the people that died in Oklahoma, or Mumbai or London or now Oslo and we can't.
“Get rid of the celery and I’ll wait in the truck,” Henri says. “Then it’s time.”
I think the most enlightening thing one learns as a writer is “if you build it, they won’t necessarily come.” No matter how passionate you are about your story, it doesn’t mean anyone else will be. One of my first bookstore readings had 6 people in the audience and one was my publisher and one was the dude who set it up. Ego check.
Nearing fall and deep into the summer of the year I turned seven, news came to Mama and Daddy of a family spotted beyond Jodie Lyons place living in a tent out in an overgrown field. Jodie's farm was the last place down the road with nothing but empty land beyond. This was shocking and highly unusual to us all - everyone lived in a house back then. At least I thought so (not the situation in the present day and time). All I could picture was the Native American way of life from long ago, living in tepees.
listen. No one is leaving.
Then, almost 2 years ago, I got pregnant with not one, but two wee ones. So, as you can imagine, last summer’s garden was virtually non-existent (the kids being about 6 mths old at the time), though I did plant an apple tree to commemorate the birth of our lovely babes. Having kids has reaffirmed our need for good organic home-grown food, and the need to get rid of more lawn to grow that home-grown food (not to mention the positive environmental implications of growing your own stuff). We have plans to build a cold-frame using reclaimed (we are proud trash-pickers) to extend the growing season. There is also the dream of owning some chickens and goats and moving to a larger piece of land one day, to expand on this dream of ours to be more self-sufficient. This year we’ve planted or started indoors, so far, 7 varieties of tomatoes, lettuces, sunflowers, melon, peas, broccoli, onions, okra, cabbage and eggplant. If all goes well (and space allows for it) there will be many more seeds planted when the soil warms up.
French is sexy. Trés, trés, sexy. I can pretty much make any girl's clothes disappear and have her all over my baguette. Which is the correct word- there is no such thing as "French Bread" in France. Bread goes a lot of meals in France, including breakfast, which isn't limited to just "Omlete du Fromage." If you had a proper childhood you know what I'm talking about (Dexter's Lab).
Checking in sucked ass. American charged me $50 per bag for being over the weight limit. (Continental, by the way, charges $25.) It used to be you could bring two bags up to 70lbs each if you were going to/from Europe. Now they've dropped it to 50lbs, with charges for up to 70. I mean, it's not too horrible, but I just get so tired of them changing the rules all the time.
don’t want to act due to reasons best known to them, thereby putting the lives of we innocent and helpless citizens at risk We don’t have a government in place, we provide ourselves with all the things we need to survive in this country, there is no power, everybody has to be on generator, no water, we have to get boreholes, education is bad, we have to send our kids abroad or to expensive private schools, no security, we have to protect ourselves to the extent that we are now finding it difficult to worship our God, Christians are afraid of going to church, Muslims are also scared, In this country nobody is safe!
Then sometime in late 1963, I noticed an issue of “The Amazing Spiderman”. While I never wanted to be bit by a radioactive spider, I immediately decided I wanted to be a chemist. 16 years later I got my college degree in chemistry.
Potential jurors will have access to the DA's website and the names of persons accused of DWI.
a) “we need to do something to be justified and pleasing to God”
Galatians 6:7-9 Do not be deceived, God is not mocked; for whatever a man sows, this he will also reap. 8 For the one who sows to his own flesh shall from the flesh reap corruption, but the one who sows to the Spirit shall from the Spirit reap eternal life. 9 And let us not lose heart in doing good, for in due time we shall reap if we do not grow weary. Definition – Eternal life is when we reap what we have sown to the Spirit. It includes doing good now and not becoming weary.
Well, sounds rather irreconcilable, doesn’t it? So can the impossible become possible, will “The Misfits” get hitched? What’s more, can their potent combination be used to bust the recession? Sounds like a fairy tale.
January 5
Time is short,
Put the cookies on a hot baking sheet and bake in a preheated oven (at 250°C) at 200°C for 10 to 15 minutes. Take out of the oven before they become gold color and leave them to cool down on a wire rack.
Bringing me to tears
Bravo, I thought.
Angela Cartwright It usually appears in a dream…I mull it over for days…I find myself thinking about it constantly, I jot down notes…titles…thoughts…Then one day I just have to start the project I have been dreaming about or I will explode. Once I get going there is no stopping me. I can work late into the night and then find I get up really early full of energy dying to get back to work. Making art is exhilarating.
Dear Martha. You have such an attractive way of putting things.”
Graziana has been wanting to make gingerbread men since she saw Shrek and now she finally has the right cutters she's been able to fulfil this desire. These gingerbread men are sweetened with honey and spiced with ginger and a touch of cinnamon.
Gloats over Christ Dying Young, A passage from Sanhedrin 106 gloats over the early age at which Jesus died: "Hast thou heard how old Balaam (Jesus) was?--He replied: It is not actually stated but since it is written, Bloody and deceitful men shall not live out half their days it follows that he was thirty-three or thirty-four years old."
maggots and leaves, willows and snow.
Turkish-Israeli dogfight over occupied northern Cyprus US Ambassador to Israel Dan Shapiro: ‘The military option against Iran isn’t just possible, it’s ready Israel’s space program (Scientific American) Wultz family awarded large damages Fayyad and Abbas Complete the Ramallah Reshuffle Overnight music video Iran told Hezbullah not to attack Israel? Hezbullah fighting for Assad Inevitable: North Korea back to work on reactor Latest nonsense from Shlomo Sand – “The Land of Israel is a myth”
After finishing a second cigarette, my nerves were calm. Jim pulled up in a dark Mercedes. Cool—none of my former foster families were wealthy. I met him and Lana a week ago, but not their daughter Brooke. This time the caseworker suggested placing me in a family with a teenage girl. As if me and Brooke would be close friends, and my senior year would be the best ever. I was smart enough to know that would never happen. I just needed to get through these last six months with the Claytons, and I’d be on my own.
Love’s flames are fiery flames — the fiercest of all.
So I went to the craft store and bought a yard of green felt.
Operating cash flow was $2.78 billion for the trailing twelve months, compared with $1.76 billion for the trailing twelve months ended March 31, 2009. Free cash flow increased 62% to $2.32 billion for the trailing twelve months, compared with $1.43 billion for the trailing twelve months ended March 31, 2009.
Here’s the full e-mail:
Then again, much of this also conjures up the cinema of the mostly forgotten fellow Japanese director Keisuke Kinoshita and his groundbreaking work on such films as The Ballad of Narayama and The River Fuefuki. Of course with Kinoshita being the closest thing classic Japanese cinema has to a Douglas Sirk, perhaps this is all mere happenstance. Whatever the case, The Makioka Sisters is a true masterpiece of cinema and deserves to be recognized as such. Its recent restoration (it made a repertory round last Summer) and release as part of the ever growing Criterion Collection (a beautiful transfer indeed) will hopefully make this happen.
Even though I was pretty lazy with February, (most of mine ended up being described to you) it was fun to see everyone else's photos and it gave me something to think about each day. So I figured I'd try again for March. Official rules and how to play at fat mum slim.
You might contact this seller on Ebay: I have purchased parts from him in the past, as have some of Tappan Talk readers and his prices have been reasonable.
Then this morning, I handed Clay a pair of socks as I was folding laundry and told him, "Get your socks and shoes on." (I used to say "get your shoes and socks on", but I have too many smart-aleck kids who would put their shoes on first and then try to pull their socks on over their shoes. "Well you said to put my shoes and socks on," they'd smirk.)
Younis Salim Khafif, 43, his wife Aida Yasin Ahmed, 41, their 8-year-old son Muhammad, 14-year-old daughter Noor, 10-year-old daughter Sabaa, 5-year-old daughter Zainab, 3-year-old daughter Aisha and a one-year-old baby girl who was staying at their home were all attacked with hand grenades and shot to death at close range. In the third house, four adult brothers, Jamal, Marwan, Qahtan and Chasib Ahmed were all killed by the Marines. Another brother, Yousif, who survived the attack, recalled, “The Americans gathered my four brothers and took them inside my father’s bedroom, to a closet. They killed them inside the closet.” The soldiers then took photos of the dead and desecrated their bodies by urinating on them.
The court's findings constitute a victory for ISPs, which cannot be forced by copyright owners to install cumbersome and costly filtering mechanisms aimed at detecting and stopping copyright infringements committed by their users (though ISPs are not prevented from voluntarily introducing a filtering system as a consequence of an agreement struck with right holders). The decision has also been welcomed by digital freedom organizations and hailed as being capable of boosting free speech online: in their eyes, this decision confirms that invasive and general monitoring of internet users' activities is unfeasible and unacceptable. The court's ruling stresses instead the need and relevance of a neutral and open internet environment which respects fundamental rights.
Here are the best-selling titles for NUELOW Games this month. Our sales were not quite as strong as in October, and I don't think the Thanksgiving sale made a difference one way or the other; our prices are already so low that knocking a bit off the price won't entice anyone that wasn't going to buy anyway.
Food: Despite the beer tour, this is a restaurant first and foremost. On our most recent visit, we decided to focus on Old Chicago’s self-ascribed specialty – pizza. We split a large Hawaiian deep-dish pizza; while the sauce and toppings were good, the crust was disappointingly un-deep-dish like. It was served in a pan, but it tasted a lot like a premade Domino’s crust, and was not tremendously thick. Disappointing. That being said, the menu itself looks promising, with a great variety of pasta and sandwiches in addition to pizza.
2 pounds fresh, tender mustard greens
Here are some pics of the 2 lamps:
The mystery is fun and fast paced keeping the reader interested in finding the big baddies. Over the course of the series you really begin to love this quirky town and all the characters.
And you thought YOUR neighbors were a little off their rocker! ;)
And of course, the most important step: pass it on to your prospects! Be a winner and then duplicate yourself.
The spectre of fascism still haunts and universal equality has not been achieved.
The thing is, if Najib is truly innocent and the French court has no evidence whatsoever – as his underlings are desperately spreading down the corridors of Putrajaya – why didn’t Najib announce to the world that he is sending a lawyer to clarify the matter? Why didn’t the Malaysian premier make a public declaration that he is innocent and the truth will be made clear in the French trial?
Many of them will still rely on the “major press” “opinions” and all its paid-advert-lies-ing, going to large open air festivals hundred of kilometres away from their place, paying a shitload of money to “discover” “new bands” that are twenty years old and played twenty times at the corner of their streets for a price I couldn’t even buy cigarettes with. That’s sad, but that’s the way it is.
NEW YORK, NEW YORK – It’s one way to meet men.
Where: Deck
“Does not the potter have power over the clay, from the same lump to make one vessel for honor and another for dishonor?”
Every mother wants a peaceful and gentle birth for her baby. A water birth in this case, is truly considered heavenly and beneficial for birthing mothers. This type of birth not only benefits the mother by helping better relaxation and reducing her pain, but will also benefit her baby too. While babies are inside the amniotic sac in their mothers wombs, they are warm and cozy like as if in a warm bathtub! so if you birth in a similar environment its truly going to be so gentle on the baby. Isn't it?
My favorite parts were the speeches at the reception (#CharlieFTW), and a last-minute visit from Jacob and his furry friends (in which they discuss something I found hilarious with the most serious faces EVER). After Ze Wedding, Edward and Bella fly off to their honeymoon in lovely Brazil, where they spend their days in the secluded Isle Esme.
(No one’s POV)
- Every New Yorker has wondered how television characters can afford their spacious homes. And now Barbara Corcoran explains it all. TRD
Last night I dreamed I was a member of a large family, with five brothers. The family was well off, perhaps making their fortune in dubious ways. I don’t remember exactly. One of my brothers was killed and I was framed for it. Almost no one believed me and I had to go on the run and try to figure out who had framed me. I convinced my girl friend that I was innocent and she was helping me. Otherwise, I was alone and pretty much everyone else was working against me. I remember lots of narrow escapes.
Bulgarian Carrot 1/1
The City of Torrance's run is pretty big for a Thanksgiving morning Turkey Trot (almost 4,000 people). I took some photos of these runners who dressed up for the holiday!
As your touch reaches beyond,
Mandy
I'll just leave this here for you to think about.
I colored her with prisma color pencils and Martha Steward
3. I've heard several people rip on the trailer for this movie. Say huh? That, I just don't get. Now, you all know I try to avoid trailers because they spoil movies, but I've watched this one several times since going. I think it's one of the greatest trailers ever. That loud, tonal, booming sound. That's my new favorite sound.
(Oh, and you can double click on the pic to see it in all it's glory!)
Southern Living's cover this month inspired me to work on a planter for our front porch. Now, you know mine isn't the wow factor of Southern Living, but I am thrilled to have some color on our porch! Here is what mine looks like!
31. Deep Down - Christy (parade 50) (03:03)
Preheat oven to 350 F. In a medium-sized bowl, whisk all-purpose flour, mesquite flour, baking powder, and baking soda. In another medium-sized bowl beat butter, sugar, and brown sugar until light and fluffy. Beat the eggs and yogurt into the butter/sugar. Alternately add the flour mixture and the apple cider to the butter/sugar mixture, beating after each addition until just combined. Fold in the cheese and bacon. Fill cupcake liners 3/4 full. Bake for 20 minutes or until cupcakes bounce back when lightly touched.
After the appointment was over, I went outside to cool down. It was a bit too warm in my office.
Translated by Abu Talhah Dawud ibn Ronald Burbank
Thursday I received an email from Sarah Bessey. I hope to never get over how much this means to me. There was a marked change in the way that I write out my life when I read hers. Her honest living and writing gave me permission to be the me God is molding me into. The Lord saw fit that I receive her words to me on my lunch break and cried big fat ugly tears on the keyboard until the bell rang and my freshmen were about to walk in the door. (The only crying that is acceptable in my 9th grade class is the crying I cause.) She did not smack my hand for bringing her name into all of my mess, but instead offered prayer, understanding that grad-school is hard for the wife too, and assurance that as loud as we howl, it is enough. God is enough.
He had riled up all the shoppers and the store even called the coppers. I guess they did not like all the shrinking of food and such and how they charged more or just as much. The nut did have a point and spurted some round about Face it Facts as he got each nose out of joint. When I left he was still screaming sass and I just avoided the coppers from seeing my little rhyming ass.
Using bottle glass is fun. With Bullseye and Spectrum glass made for fusing, the coefficients of the glass are already matched so I can use different colours together, there is no danger of shattering or cracking in the kiln. Plus, the glass has a memory and naturally tries to revert to a useful 6mm thick. Bottle glass is anarchistic – I can’t mix bottles – they each have their own coefficient – and they choose their own thickness and shape, all I can do is shepherd and coax it where I want.
So, that is why I don’t know how to react to Betty Dodson’s statements. To engage with her ridiculousness is to divert my energies from much more important work that urgently needs to be done. But if I chose to be quiet I’m afraid I might communicate to other young brown feminists out there that feminism is still a space of hurt and humiliation for women of color where speaking out is met with personal attacks from older ‘experts’.
Their voices penetrating my flesh,
In 1990 there was famously a 21 man brawl between Manchester United and Arsenal which saw points deductions. A similar result could seriously hamperCrawleywho are in the battle for an automatic promotion spot. This wouldn’t also be helpful toBradfordas it would drag them back into a relegation scramble there thought they had escaped from.
We served it with a salad made of fennel, snow peas, and an oil and lemon juice dressing, home-made cottage cheese dill bread, pickles and olives.
I’m so happy that I’ve kept up with this. It’s a story that’s told itself to me over almost fifteen years, and I’m really getting geared up with it. There are preparation charts, maps, hundreds of pages of notes… and now coming close to a first-draft full novel.
However these effects pale in comparison to an earlier similar episode in the nineteenth century. Then, the aurora displays in the night had not only been magnificent, but had extended great distances from both poles, and when dawn had come it had been reddened with a strange sinister light. At the same time telegraph operators received shocks from surges, and the whole system was awash with an unknown power from outside.
Patients were opposed to the trials right from the start due to patient selection criteria - save from two unrepresentative organisations who have taken money from the government in order to accept their policies toward ME.
Jean
Who'll give me a steady life
Picture 3&4 Beat DK in attic 2
Back to that last test. Fulton called into the squad and then not used, was a failing of a massive proportion. I fail to see how he could have been called in, if they were thinking about using McCullum in the position he played all along. I would have rather seen us loose with a solid squad and players in the correct position, than what looked like a patch up job.
When the war was over, he continued his education at Singapore’s Victoria School and went on to work as a clerk in a hospital.
Thursday, September 29: 5:30 pm-10:00 pm
Key Players: Noah Hartsock (16.7 ppg, 5.2 rpg), Brandon Davies (15 ppg, 7.3 rpg), Matt Carlino (12.7 ppg, 4.7 apg), Charles Abouo (11.5 ppg, 6.5 rpg), Brock Zylstra (8.4 ppg)
My third game was against Nate and his Blood Angel Death Company army. Close game that I lost 1-2.
And the great thing about going to the park is that its free. There is always parks for kids to play at- wherever you are. My kids love going to the park and the one near my old workplace (by the sea) is always a favourite - especailly as the park has had a renovation and has now a pirate ship as part of the play area.
Do you think there is enouf? im not sure?....
A special on Frites:
The two cosmonauts turned to their left. One-hundred meters to their left was the definitive separation of the moon from like to dark. Kostya felt like it was a line drawn in the sand, daring the two men to cross. Beyond were voids in the stars, where giant peaks formed a mountainous skyline. While the rest of the world was content to look at the dark side of the Moon through a lens, the Russians would not stand for less than putting men on the crags themselves.
Peel potatoes and cut into ½ to 1 inch pieces. Spray a large piece of heavy duty aluminum foil with cooking spray. Place potato pieces on the foil and sprinkle with salt, pepper, and herb blend (or your favorite herbs such as marjoram, basil, thyme, and savory), and toss with your hands to distribute the spices all over the potatoes. Close up aluminum foil packet and place on Traeger rack. (You can also do this just in the oven, but they don’t taste quite as good.)
He got up and went over to the stove and I hugged him and I said I don’t want to do this. And he said what was all this for (pointing at all the pictures of us) just a waste of money I guess…And I hugged him and walked with him and said it doesn’t have to be and he said yea but you want to leave and I said I don’t want to, I have to. I thought my heart was going to fall out, I didn’t want to let go of him. I wanted to close my eyes and hug him forever and forget about everything else.
If I acknowledge that Miss Fisher’s Murder Mysteries is a fine, passable, C+ piece of drama and that Episode 10 was one of the more enjoyable episodes we’ve seen this season, can we talk about why that’s not really good enough? Miss Fisher’s is a murder mystery series, we get this much from the title, and murder mysteries, by their very nature, are rinse and repeat affairs and that to go into a murder mysteries series expecting more than that is somewhat naive. This is sometimes enjoyable, sometimes boring little series that even at its worse isn’t a complete failure thanks to competent acting and some nice costumes, but shouldn’t we demand more than that from the ABC?
Toadstool Alcazar architecture kit Beat Donkey Kong at Toadstool Castle
Here is the complete answer with some extensive explanations from the commander of the primary Andromeda Council biosphere. To be very honest, I was astounded at the depth of his answer. Here’s what I learned:
In the aftermath of the Oslo attacks, one Israeli political commentator suggested that Norwegian authorities’ ambiguous views on terrorism perhaps had an impact on Breivik’s decision to execute the attacks. I don’t personally subscribe to this assertion, but I believe that such a claim is just as valid as claims made by the Left that Breivik was heavily influenced by right-wing bloggers. I believe Breivik and only Breivik is to blame. There is a very distinct difference between ideas and actions.
If the answer is: I'm sorry, sweetie. We can't get that today.
Finally, and maybe this won't mean as much to younger craft drinkers...there's no raspberry beer. Cheap sweet raspberry beers were huge in the run-up to the shakeout, but when the trendy drinkers tired of them, they moved on to the next thing, and it wasn't a beer thing. No, the beers you see selling big today are beers like Victory makes. They're beers that rely on solid cornerstones of brewing: malt, grain, hops, yeast, and what brewers and maltsters can do with them. That's the story at Victory -- always has been -- and that's what's selling craft beer to America.
We had borrowed my grandpas pickup while we were in town so we had to return that to Vancouver before heading home. This meant mom and I were in separate vehicles for the first part of the trip. Near the beginning of the trip we realized that my mom had no brake lights! Ahhh no good. This basically began a string of events that would contribute to the 12 hour drive. As crazy as all the stops, horrendous traffic, rain and so much more were it was really awesome to see how God was right there with us the whole way! Each stop had a purpose and even though it seemed like it took forever to get home I was thankful for each thing. Our trip from Oregon City to Vancouver should have been about 30 minutes took close to 5 hours!!! But once we dropped off Grandpas pickup it was smooth sailing!
“I’m happier than a pig wot’s just won its own weight in shit in a shit-winning contest,” laughs Cronkwers McGwilligers (above right), a Lincolnshire-based professional animal botherer who’s won first prize in a Church of England writing competition.
We must not allow the lies of political correctness to hide that truth, or as importantly, ever cause us ever to forget Kriss Donald.
If you have questions about Adopting a rescue Dog or becoming a foster parent,
Download this app now for a quick but highly interactive session that not only draws together amazing stories of hope for the future but also enables personal pledging of individual actions towards this. The resultant stories will give you so much insight into the impact of your approach to environmental learning.
To ease our minds, we decided to do some tests on our sample piece of Giallo Ornamentale granite. We divided the piece in half and applied sealer to one side.
This is it! Finally after hours and hours of studying and tests, and clinical days, I'm in the final week of nursing school! I can't even believe it that it's finally down to 6 more days!!!
I am the "baby" of the family. In fact, the next person older than me is older by seven years. Some distance there. The eldest of the family is older than me by... 12 years? I think that's right.
That heals the wound and cures not the disgrace:
See how still his eyes remain.
Nat Geo US reair 05/13/2011 01:00
Sometimes I wish my children would do something other than beat each other black and blue at every given moment.
Besides sleeping and driving like a crazy person, one of my favorite things in life is food. Eating it, talking about it, writing about it – I guess you could say if food had a cheering section, I would be right up front wearing an ill-fitting cheerleader outfit and screaming the loudest.
On the other hand, the liberal-minded white (usually the women) can get rather hot under the collar with their fellow-whites the moment you suggest that birds of different feathers should not flock together, and that solid brick walls (and locked gates) beween neighbours of different colour and culture are sometimes needed to keep the peace.
The sight of Lough Graney would dazzle my eyes,
Everyone knows the tax will start at €100 and rise relentlessly, if we let it. The Economic Social and Research Institute called for household taxes for years. Its leading economist, John Fitzgerald, has said this is only “the beginning” and that a home tax of €800 plus a water tax of €500 is needed.
I’m curious how much this show is like the books. So far it’s felt like a soap opera, not so much a single story as an ongoing look into the lives of the people of Bon Temps. The thought occurs to me that a full length novel might stretch out to fill 12 episodes of TV nicely, so I wonder if it’s sort of a “One book per season” deal.
Obama sees American strength as provocative. He believes its nuclear arsenal is excessive, and hence worthy of reduction, without fearing in any way that shredding the nuclear deterrent might actually have profoundly deleterious consequences not only on US national security, but on security and stability in the world as a whole. He sees his presidency causing “the tide of war” to recede in Iraq, Afghanistan and elsewhere, just as his tenure will mark “the moment when the rise of the oceans began to slow”. Dramatic reductions in military budgets, and the consequent devastating reductions in force levels, capabilities and weapons systems, apparently do not trouble him even slightly.
I love these postcard poems, and the fact that I will have written 31 brand new poems by the end of the month – no easy feat that, getting me to work so much in such a short space of time. I’m very happy with the core poems that are appearing on the cards straight off my pen; some of them will need a little tweaking and become short poems but others will mix and match, blend into each other. This is a great habit to cultivate and I would love to continue, even if I don’t actually send the cards to anyone I’d like to collect them for myself – must find a nice box.
Even so as the streets emerged on our journeys through the old city, revealing buildings I had never seen before, it was as if I had always known them for, I had heard of them, of their association with the one whom fate led away, the role they once played in his life, and the potential his presence nurtured and promised.
Basketball star formerly with the Portland Trailblazers
It's an ugly metaphor, isn't it? But it does describe the concept very well. And I do this in real life. A lot. Some of it is just me working out my thoughts in my head as I speak and so I repeat stuff when I go back to where I knew I was on solid logical footing and rethink, but that's not all of it. It's not even most of it.
*Grand Ballroom of the Historic Pasadena Masonic Lodge 200 S. Euclid Avenue, Pasadena, CA 91101
05:00 (5:00 a.m.) – following day – Japan Standard Time – Tokyo
This is a Chef’s Kitchen! Lots of cabinets, exterior vent, 5 burner gas cook top, lots of counter space, self closing drawers, and lots of window to enjoy the view of the back yard.
First, there was this:
It was for Tampax Tampons, and went something like this: “It is difficult for a girl to make it in the Spotify world. Music is competitive, and there are many obstacles for women. Now, women can eliminate her period as one of those obstacles.” I don’t remember the exact wording, because like I said–I was studying.
They answered and said to him, “Our father is Abraham.”
Myth No. 3: People in less than adequate health can’t get life insurance.
And there's also a brand new offer over at Creations by Penny, where if you buy any two of my paper sets you can choose a third set for free. For this one, just enter CC3for2 at checkout.
I’m not sure if all of this officially qualifies as “going viral.” I’m certainly no Susan Boyle, or kid riding home from the dentist. I’m not even Amy Chua, whose book “Battle Hymn of the Tiger Mother” and controversial excerpt in the Wall Street Journal elbowed me out of the motherhood-news spotlight a couple of days later.
Her comments followed the tweets: “@shilpitewari it has to be consensual or else he can much better/younger girls if he wants to exploit.”
It was a hit, and despite my bringing crackers to spread it on, people were choosing to eat it as they would any piece of cheesecake, in a slice on a plate, but this time covered in crumbled bacon. Bacon Bliss. That is all.
It’s been 10 days apart. 10 days of thinking. 10 days of wondering. 10 days of thinking if it’s time.
私は数年前の一時帰国中に友達と遊んでいたとき、友達の１人が彼の吸っていた煙草を小さな携帯用のポケット灰皿に、小気味良い仕草でそっと入れたのを見ました。彼は美容師で、ほっそりとしたスタイルのいい男の子で、そのタバコを処理するにあたっての彼の一連の仕草は、私にすごくいい印象を与えたので、今でも覚えています。それは小さな仕草ですが、そこには街や環境への考慮、デリカシーがあります。
Fingers trembling, I scroll down in my phone contacts to “Mom” and press the send button. Perhaps I should tell her I didn’t answer because I just walked out of church I thought.
Beans
That same year at Asilomar, I took a class from Jean Wells. I had grandiose plans to create a huge 50x50 inch quilt using this technique. I would have to make millions of flowers.
So I say hurray for the women who “rose above their sex” to the extent that they could recognize their oppression and speak against it.
I gazed at this cover over & over as a kid, and I played my tape of it endlessly, I’d often rewind Burt Bacharach’s Baby It’s You. Most of the songs were knocked out in 1 ten hour recording session in early 1963, and it’s always been among my favourite records.
Needless to say, they weren’t allowed to be out of eyesight of my mom for a very long time after that whenever I and a car were involved.
And Dinner of fish from the river
B. The Importance Of The Covenant
Have piece of my art displayed somewhere
My husband is about at the end of his six weeks because a.) he started the week before I did, and b.) his plan wasn't really about losing weight, so he can say that's enough whenever he wants. So I guess that his six weeks were over Saturday, though technically I think that was closer to five weeks.
We have FOUR BRAND NEW SETS for you tonight and they are all available NOW at
four shots, one to the head, chest,
As for getting noticed by bookers and talent coordinators – you need to understand that sometimes it’s not about the funny. It should be, but it isn’t. Sometimes it’s about fitting a demographic – whether it be female, gay, minority – sometimes a show needs to fill a certain percentage with various groups. I’m not saying that there aren’t very funny people that fall within those category breakdowns – of course there are. It just becomes a question of section percentages. Take for instance the Canadian Comedy Awards (we really have them, although the public really doesn’t know that). In the category of Best stand-up (male and female), very few males have had multi-year nominations (let alone multi-wins), yet the female side has been pretty much the same group (give or take) for the past six or so years. Bookers are also relying on the comedians to do a lot of their work – sending tapes, DVDs and YouTube links. I think that should be happening, but I also think that it’s on the bookers and scouts to be out in the community, watching the shows, meeting the comics. Getting a CTV Comedy Now should not be based on one set. Beyond that, it’s also about personality – maybe you just don’t click with the person at that level. Or maybe someone thinks that you’re not the right look, or age, or your material is too different.
P.S. Monday is usually the day I post Monday Mode photos, but I felt strongly about writing about Japan and thought that Monday Mode can wait till next week.
Bob McCarthy – banjo;
Loving hands, from things
Only it's all a crock of — well — crap, I'm afraid. His argument for human progress is so thin, so grossly over-simplified and ridiculously reductionist as to be no better than the sort of thing that pops into your head when you've smoked some really good weed after dinner. And then to use it as the justification for leading the young people of the world off on a campaign of technological positivism, based on about as much technical savvy as in a Jetson's cartoon, is to my mind, positively criminal. To me, the underlying game here is "Keep my scam going (and my books selling) for as long as possible". From the blurb on Amazon that goes with his book The Third Industrial Revolution: How Lateral Power Is Transforming Energy, the Economy, and the World:
I've found out a reason for me
So what I did was this: I took my parents off the reservation and switched it to a standard room at Art of Animation...since The Little Mermaid section is opening earlier than planned! Yippee!! If my parents decide they are in, all we gotta do it make a new reservation just for them in a standard room. It is cheaper for us to stay in standard rooms anyway, even with us splitting the suite (Those things are awesome, but way pricey! Two standard rooms is cheaper...but a good amount.)
When I imagine this sequence working better, it is not necessarily with a different actor in the role, but replaced with another character type – perhaps not one based around a task but a recognizable type, nonetheless, maybe the standard issue university professor with a plummy english accent who spends the whole sequence tamping his pipe. He says many of the same lines that the character now has, including the racial epithets, but instead they now work, because we do not consider the possibility of knowing this character any deeper than any of the others, whether it’s his use of racial epithets, or his friendship with Jules Winfield. I give the idea of a professor as an example, but it could be any other type, a blues musician, a rich man, a con man, as long as it be clearly a type, rather than the possibility of a realistic character.
- Win any one Adept Rank Air-conditioned Contest
COMPARISON SHOPPING: Jane’s Journey
The team has a diverse opposition base and a growing reputation for being as useful as a whore’s chastity belt. As Spherical Object Progression Executive you will be responsible for delivering goal-optimised ball passes, producing a little bit of effort and hitting the back of the fucking net occasionally.
We can't tell you the right thing to say, but Jennifer Fields and Alexis Stodghill --- two African-American women from the office who date all colors of the rainbow -- are about to school the men of this world (white, black, Asian and Inuit) on the worst things you can say to a black woman.
I do draw and paint in the Dacha as well, I have a writing side and a drawing side, but my pure illustration work is now almost non existent, my last big job was illustrating Aladdin and the Enchanted Lamp for Philip Pullman, which was just recently published.
In all probability, the victims had socialised at some venue where their behaviour could be scrutinised by the trickster without raising suspicion. Not wishing to cause further embarrassment by questioning them, I made discrete enquiries among the catering staff. As luck would have it, one of them recognised the listed names as belonging to a bridge-playing group of twenty that met three nights a week. He had served them a finger buffet in the salon room they had booked for their tournament. The prankster was surely a member of that party and I racked my brains for a quick method of identifying the rogue. And then it dawned on me that it could only be one person.
The kale and red leaf lettuce got tired of waiting for me to get better.
God, I don’t even know what to say.
"Today, up to 70 percent of people who have heart attacks are in a low or intermediate risk category for a heart attack when their risk is estimated using traditional risk prediction models. That’s not very predictive, and we need to do better," said Dr. Christie Ballantyne, director of the Center for Cardiovascular Disease Prevention at the Methodist DeBakey Heart & Vascular Center and Baylor College of Medicine in Houston and last author on the study. "Our research shows that a noninvasive ultrasound can give us a more complete snapshot of our patients’ risk, so we can do a better job determining if they’ll have a heart attack."
Plants used were all indigenous and adapted to the area, while large sculptures by Anton Smit create visual interest in the landscape.
she is referring to the children in our montessori classroom.
Ending on a positive note. This story as been picked up in Pakistan. Good. The people of Pakistan who are desperate to escape that hell hole and turn Our Home into one should realise they really are not welcome here.
31) New England Patriots: CB Janoris Jenkins
Anytime the pantry is left open these days, this is what happens. Parker takes off to the pantry, grabs Bella's food and heads to her bowls to fill her up (not really, but those are his intentions)!
Pinch 2 - Apply even more Pressure
Other issues: the Georgia Pacific contract
A few days later, my mother died of a massive heart attack. It happened so
its been a rough time off and on though, I was going through year books and boxes from highschool and found a letter that nate wrote me, I thought I had been doing pretty good it was like some days I still felt like everything was ok , but other days with no warning or cue I just feel like someone has kicked me square in the chest and all my air is gone and my heart sinks deep into the pit of my stomach, Its like im 15 years old sitting there next to him and then he is gone, and I am alone no matter how many people are there around me.. daron and all my friends are trying so hard to support me but some days I just can’t help but burst into tears , I can’t imagine a world that my best friend isn’t in, I can’t imagine where I would be had he not always been there for me... it’s like the world should just be frozen in place. I think about the fact that im 21 years old ... 21! I have a house a husband a really good job , but when it comes down to it, I have so much left to learn so many things to do still some days I wake up just excited about what the day holds... im just a kid and so was He.. that is the feeling that knocks my heart from my chest the feeling that he’s never going to get to do the things im doing, and He was gonna do so much, he had such a big heart He was bright and filled with life .always took care of me - he walked me to every class my freshman year . I wrote in my diary when I was 11 that nate was the first boy I ever loved , he was also the first boy who ever told me he loved me the funny thing was, I kissed him one time we were 13(took me a few years to work up the courage) and we both said YUCK YUCK never agian – I know right?? (Some friendships are just meant to be) but from that point on he was always there for me always by my side. when Tim and my mom used to fight we used to lay on the roof and watch the stars , he was the one who helped me move outof their house he always believed in me i moved out got a job and look at me know thanks to him.I thought I was so much braver than I am I don’t feel brave at all anymore.
Records — Fordham 6-0, Salesian 2-2.
confusion works in the bird world?)
Although King James contributed no money to its production and although no record of an official authorisation of the finished product survives, if such were ever issued, the Bible came to be known as the King James Version. It was certainly not the only, or the first, Authorised Version. The Coverdale, or Great, Bible was the truly Authorised Bible (under Henry VIII) in English, and the Bishops Bible was Authorised by Queen Elizabeth I.
Information asymmetry sounds very much like the obfuscating language introduced into the higher education humanities by postmodernists in the 1980s and 1990s.
The list then becomes:
However, my WIPs and my finishes are getting rather out of sync! I’m very aware that I’ve shared a few WIPs that may then seem to have disappeared off the face of the earth!
power and yet they are so wonderful
The movie, Mighty Fine is a film based in the 1970's on writer/director Debbie Goodstein's childhood experiences with anger, aggression and how that played out in her family. The family moved from Brooklyn to New Orleans in search of a better life. The father, Joe Fine (Chazz Palminteri) knew that his business would do better in Louisiana vs. New York. Joe loves his wife, Stella (Andie MacDowell) and daughters (Jodelle Ferland and Rainey Qualley) and does his best to care for them while struggling with outburst of explosive, rage-filled anger. His mood swings happen around his family which leaves them always in a state of uncertainty.
Nose: Fresh oak, pepper, earthy peat, lime juice, soap flakes, cherry blossom, pineapple and a little salt
Gumbo and craft beer are like that. You cannot help yourself, if you pair a well crafted beer with your next cold weather gumbo, you will return to the gumbo pot (and to your ice box) at least two more times. I recommend a good American Pale Ale, or an American version of an India Pale Ale. If you must have a lager, try the Pilsner Urquell – especially with a seafood gumbo. The zip from the hops in that beer are refreshing and really cleanses the palate between the spoonfuls of roux, seafood and seasonings.
Has space, human body, animals..all kinds of stuff from games to programs. I was thinking this could be good next year to help study for a biology exam...?? LOL...or an older child who likes or could be interested in Science~
“WTF”
What to do if caught in a thunderstorm outdoors?
Max's will debut its 25th Anniversary Ale, brewed by
If I have caught your attention in any way, please read the novel for yourself and decide if it is worthy to be published. The book in whole has ----words, and can be sent disk (floppy), CD, or by mail. Would you rather have a general outline, or the book itself?
Love and Acceptance
The idea is to plant the image then return to it, creating a good transition as you do.
CHARLES
The United Kingdom is not a member of the group of nations using the Euro, but most of its trade is with the Eurozone nations. If those countries' currency starts to disintegrate, Britain's trade will be severely impacted... and Britain is now into another recession which can scarcely handle that.
This would insure that your local area could be replanted in the future no matter what happened to global warming or other unforeseen tragedy.
One took place in a church. Surrounded by the trappings of culture and ritualised belief, protocol and decorum and stand now and sit now and say this now. I understand some people take comfort from that.
The scandal began after Lomas was accused of kissing a 26-year-old single mum in his £189-per night hotel room.
Quite a magician and quite a show, one which could afford to have three buffoons stand around in clown heads. Virgil's greatest trick, however, was marrying the lovely Julie Capriotti. In 1929, the magician asked for a volunteer from the audience and young Julie stepped up. The Great Virgil injured her on stage! While visiting her in the hospital, they fell in love and married two years later.
1 t. baking soda
Her: Umm I don't know.
In fact, I decided to go all out and invite like, 20 people over (I think maybe 13 are coming) and arrange to cook a huge buffet. Since most of these people have never celebrated Thanksgiving before they are most likely going to interpret this as an invitation to come over and get drunk on a weeknight, but I don't care! I will have twinkly music, candles, flowers, and green bean casserole and it will be awesome! It won't be exactly the same as in America- ie, no Martha Stewart inspired placeholders, 20 year old handmade turkey paper mache centerpiece, or football- but I will have a fairly decent replica of the event, just 6 hours earlier.
Pretty riveting, I'm sure, but everyone continually thought I was simply calling the sites "Mel's Portraits" instead of "Mel S. Portraits" which just so happens to be my first name followed by last unfortunate initial. It didn't have a very good ring, so, we now have a fancy title with a great acronym to go along with it: CCMS.
As I followed my mother around the grocery store on Saturday, complaining about how I don't have enough sweaters and generally acting like a spoiled brat, we came across a sale rack full of sweaters. I am making a point to be a brat more often now.
Block had been putting gas into a stolen car when an employee at the gas station called police. Fanchalsky says officers tried to take him into custody but he escaped and ran into the office building, prompting a lockdown.
Today I dealt with two other questions from an FoI applicant for information about the ‘costs’ involved in s136 – although they didn’t say whether they meant costs measured in time or money or both!
Wow! It sounds like I'm one of those irritable people Mr. Bridges describes in his book. Forgive me, please.
SEC. 26. In times of war or other national emergency, the Congress may by law authorize the President, for a limited period and subject to such restrictions as it may prescribe, to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out a declared national policy.
When introducing the branches, make sure that the different types are distributed evenly. You don't want all your red berries at the bottom, for example. Color and texture in general should always be evenly distributed. Again - lots of stepping back and assessing at all angles.
- A unique download code for you to download the software on your computer so you will have the program to design and create unlimited projects.
1) Stress me out even more.
Trainer: Nicky Henderson Breeder: Godfrey Moylan Jockey: Barry Geraghty
As we’ve pointed out before, recycling is a sustainable buzzword. But too often kids (and their adults) learn very little about the mechanics of recycling. So that is going to be our focus for the next few days.
Usually I draw something in black also because I can photocopy it easier. Some color photocopiers can pick up the multiliners evenly, but I have the problem where the copier darkens some lines and lightens others, so my line work appears blotchy. To avoid this I draw my main lines in black then trace over my work on a light table and add fine details with the colored multiliner (this is how I did the mermaid- I have no un-colored nice line work of her because I traced from my rough, dark outlines).
Since I've been home..this should be a whole new post so I'll keep it super short. I had and got over my first case of bronchitis. I created and sold a painting. I've signed up for some exciting workshops this fall at Random Arts in Saluda, NC. Kecia Devaney is going to be there in October and Tracy Verdugo in November. And maybe..keeping my fingers crossed..maybe Katie Kendrick..maybe. So many exciting fun things happening!
The main problem with this layout is the corner where the chair is. Stuff would get stuck back there and it was difficult to get to without pulling the chair out. I was getting tired of having to do that. Plus both the dog and Boo loved to hang out behind the chair (next to the vent) so there were a myriad of issues with that there.
Gumbo III - Almost-But Not-Quite The Real Deal
You may not control all the events that happen to you, but you can decide not to be reduced by them. Try to be a rainbow in someone’s cloud. Do not complain. Make every effort to change things you do not like. If you cannot make a change, change the way you have been thinking. You might find a new solution.
It'll be more than HALF of the price if you go to China Town.
Sure, being a simple tranny, I'm highly likely to fall on his side. It must have taken a lot of guts to come completely out and be completely out there. I think it's one thing to post a few snaps and turn up to a trans social group once in a while. Not that I mean to belittle that and I'm chuffed with having those chances. I certainly wouldn't have made new friends quite so easily. I think that another key difference is that I, and maybe a few other tranny folk out there, get to go back to our day jobs as Regular Blokes.
At any rate, Pete has also heard that the services dept. is footing the monthly data bill for aircards that have never been distributed, and for other phones that have also never been distributed yet. However, the “burglary unit” can get iPads for use while officers on the street still have to buy their own jump drive, download a crash report from the in car laptop, take the jump drive in to records to be off loaded for every single report. The inefficiency of this alone is immeasurable!
And bring me flowers.
Shower tile reglazing: $600
I am wondering where she received this information as it is certainly different to what I was told by UKTI in a meeting a few weeks ago. Indeed, I was informed that UKTI had supported 376 Welsh firms to internationalise their activities even though this should be a devolved matter. Indeed, more crucially, I wonder how this compares to whatever services are now offered by the Welsh Government, especially given that it was Ieuan Wyn Jones, when economic development minister, who abolished IBW (International Business Wales) which previously had responsibility for all internationalisation activities?
"Aw no~"
NO, I didn't go under the knife. I highly doubt I could do that. Well, let's just say I'll never rule it out, I just don't want to end up looking like Herp #1 or Joan Rivers for that matter. Talk to me in 10 years when I really start showing signs of aging - I'm taking the fine lines I currently have in stride it's the rest of me sagging I may have an issue with.
Held by hands holding each other
your mouth was so dirty
‘That same week, I fired all my difficult clients. Can you imagine that?’ He laughed bitterly. ‘Which agency fires a bunch of clients because they are difficult? All at one time? Maybe I was doing it for her, maybe I was making amends… or maybe I was doing it for myself, I don’t know. But I won’t over-commit myself again, just for the money they bring in. It’s not worth it.’
hayhayhay. ok anok. so i gots too saaz mi goodbiizez. i iz the sadererst cuz we iz leevin. an ccuz my twinnererer did loooz hiz brufferer an me an tannererer wont haf mor venshurerers. corse i wil awaz luff that mosterest bootiful gurl, asta. mom duz make thoz roolz so nufink i kin duz bowt it. i duz hope she duz do that noo blog fore i duz go to that bridge, but efen if she duznt it will beez okanok acuz i wood be seeein mi peepuls an dawg frenz. i duz luff all of u. speshally u asta. ok anok. if u duz see a koolerest plane doin dives an trix thatz meeee. I stil duz haf mi waze of gettin thoz koolerest planes. ok an ok. godda go.
Miles and miles of Irish smiles
After having this epiphany, I had to ask him what he thought organizations are looking for in this new digital age and what skills we should have. He responded, “I think it depends and I think it’s changing.” It’s a popular answer when asking any question about journalism. He went on to say that the size of the organizations usually determines it. The smaller news organizations need people to be multi-skilled, while larger ones need more specificity in all aspects of creating a story.
Well... I splurged and had a piece of this pie yesterday and OH MY GOODNESS! It is yummy! I asked my mom for the recipe so I could share it with all of you. The best part - it's my favorite kind of recipe - EASY! LOL! No baking required.
Stephen Park, appointed to the board of the Department for Communities and Local Government as interim finance director between March 2010 and January 2011, was paid £335,135 through an agency. Meanwhile, his own limited company, Ashley Interim Management, paid dividends of £130,000 for 2011 and £100,000 for the previous year. The Rural Payments Agency (RPA) confirmed that at least three of its senior staff were employed through third parties in 2010-11. Jonathan Dodworth, interim finance director from May until October 2010, and David Clausen-Thue, his successor, were paid £236,183 and £160,516 respectively. A spokesman said: “These individuals were all contracted to the RPA on an interim basis while permanent staff were recruited.”
I’m relieved to report that my own home appears pretty much devoid of scandal – so far. (I cannot, regrettably, make the same claims for blasphemy). Our palazzo hosted a couple of eminently respectable Doges, Vitale and Ordelaffo, who enriched the built environment of Venice. William Dean Howells lived here in the 1860s as a newly married man and astoundingly young American consul. He was forced to leave by the depredations of his venal housekeeper.
--The Rape of the Lock by Alexander Pope
I decided to place my bets on goodness of humans and good intentions of Chance. I did nothing to stop the check. I just worried slightly about my name, address and bank info floating around Brooklyn.
Conspiracy is notoriously difficult to prove, and is suspected far more, I think, than it actually occurs.
There’s a trade-off, with generating needed energy. Infrastructure is for the greater good. You will devastate some land, some species, some livelihoods. Local input may be ignored in the U.S., too. But from what I can tell, China, with rule-of-law and regulatory problems, with a centralized regime and yet many overlapping bureaucracies, where the rural poor have little power, the situation is much worse.
I also finished Memoirs of a Geisha by Arthur Golden, a classic, to be sure, and interesting enough, but it still left me feeling a little disengaged. It was kind of a cheat to count this one in my stats, but I did reread a childhood favorite, Gudgkin the Thistle Girl by John Gardner, a short book of 4 darkly funny fairy tales.
Thank you for your support,
Over time, the button wizards, and informed denizens of the internet, found a push of a button, or simple lack of attention, would send the troll away. Eventually, the troll found few to harass and became as inconsequential as a drop of urine - left by a drunk - on a toilet seat in a convenience store.
The nature study portion of this kit is a 3 page set of notebooking pages focusing on butterflies. Your child will learn about the life cycle of butterflies, how to tell a male and female monarch butterfly apart and the anatomy of a butterfly.
Together the trio spoke with Pandora of their experiences before Gregor himself arrived at last, yawping of word that Pandora had finally ‘taken the books’ and insisting upon immediately beginning her instruction in transmutation. Once the pair retired for study, the eve quickly passed as all rested, recovered and recuperated from their ordeals while preparing to set out for their next destination: the Firebase of the Damned.
For more on LW’s speaking, music consulting, music coaching or other services, visit:
If you want to know the full scoop and details, visit this post on Ghosty's blog, but if you need an incentive, just know that there's some fantastic prizes available up for grabs. Not just that though... everyone who takes part in the event itself will be treated to a fantastic evening up at Copper Dragon after the final judging of the competition.
Lori used my "Springtime is Mine!" kit to make her chalkboard project. Wait til you read about how she made the 3D flower, too! You are gonna HAVE to try it!
I've used three Spellbinders shapes - Large Oval Nestabilities, Large Circle Nestabilities and Label 11 Nestabilities. The two JustRite sets I've used are the Breath of Spring for the Lillies of the Valley and the sentiment is from the Tiny Words set. The Tiny Words set, along with all products in the 1 3/16th size are 20% off for a short time - you can find them HERE!!!
I am relatively new to the world of Blogging and I have watched other competitions take place from afar. I had often thought that there is no way that my blog could ever stand with the other great blogs in a competition……
Dear Michel
Here is a one page kit that you can find on the on-line store:
I brought pIrusk with a Kodiak, War dog, min Demo Corps and Doom Reavers. I played against the kickass Gator list first round. We had played before a few times and that list is REALLY good. Sorry I cannot list it cause I know shit about gators, but it was warlock (feat knocked everything down) with a heavy and a light, plus a unit of gator warriors with spears in medium bases. Was a Tier list too so he had a few swamps on the table before the game!! I lost that one even when my feat nullified his. I just moved those Demo Corps half an inch too far on the 2nd turn.
Mo's challenge at the Digital Pencil this week was "All my Favorite Things". I needed to make a card for my sister... she is definitely one of my 'Favorite Things'! I decided to do one of her Favorite things...
The fear may exists in my heart, but the story of fear is not there,
But when fulfillment of the time came, God sent his son, born through a woman, and born under the Law. This was so he could redeem those under the Law so that we could be adopted. Galatians 4:4-5
The Lady of Shalott."
Line 2 large baking sheets with parchment paper, silicone liners OR lightly grease with vegetable shortening.
This is a movie that never would have flown after the Code. While corrupt politicians have always been a staple of the movies, the code would have demanded they be punished (a la Senator Paine in Mr. Smith Goes to Washington). Although there was no specific injunction against depicting corrupt public officials--as there is in contemporary Chinese film, for example--The Breen Office frowned on criticisms of the system itself and there was an injunction against "sedition," which is something that's often in the eye of the beholder, depending on their political point of view. While this may sound outrageous to American ears in an era of relaxed censorship, it's worth keeping in mind that movies were unprotected as speech in the classic Hollywood era, having been ruled so by The Supreme Court in 1915 (a decision not overturned until 1952). It was legal for governments to censor them, and they often did.
Call me crazy, but I think that was him answering my "tell me where it hurts" request. I'm not proposing he understood the english syntax, but...you know what I mean. Maybe he's trying to point me in the right direction. We'll see in 19 days, I suppose. God, that diagnosis cannot come soon enough.
9.Depression
“Dad! That was mean!” She said hitting him with a pillow on the side of the head.
4. Take a look at Long Reads (@longreads), the Byliner (@TheByliner) and The Atavist (@TheAtavist). You may play the video if you have headphones for the computer. Many people, including Tim Harrower, claim that the internet and online reading are killing long-form journalism. After looking at these three sites, and possibly referring to things like Kindle Singles or other e-readers or apps (hint, hint), what do you think the future of long-form journalism may look like?
I am competitive by nature. Competition brings out the best and worst in people. Writing competitions help us put our best work out there and also helps us realize the worst about our own skill. Such a fun way to learn, improve, and get read!
“That’s no moon, it’s a space station!”
10-07 Los Angeles, CA – Hollywood Bowl #%
The second thing I respect about apps like Instagram is the likeability factor. (I’m not even sure if that is a word…catch me if you can, Grammar Police!) I think community apps like Instagram catch on because they make photography accessible. Brian Jarvis, of the Brian Jarvis Band, uses Instagram as a marketing tool for his music. He noticed that as a culture, we embrace technology that makes life (or in this case, creating art) easier and more accessible. He gave examples he was familiar with such as Auto-Tune and Pro Tools. People have readily adopted those programs because they make decent quality music recordings a whole heck of a lot easier. The polished studio sound still requires knowledge and hard-earned skill, but for the average consumer, a program like Cakewalk is a dream come true!
They need to tart up and fancy and put in paved paths where trails once did nicely. Health and safety or just spending the money they have. But most of all – governments need to do something. They need to repair.
Concurrence of Dorairaj Nadesan and Frankie D’Cruz to be a signatory was received after the statement was issued
All that matters this afternoon is Arsenal emerging with three points. Events elsewhere are out of their control but for third place to be guaranteed, Arsenal must win their matches first and foremost, taking advantage of any slips by others.
In a situation where one person is hurt by another, especially in break-ups, I have often seen (and felt) that person feeling a mix of anger and an attempt at being understanding and forgiving. Unfortunately, this often results in the hurt person putting the other persons feelings first. I often advise my friends to let themselves feel their anger--they can come back to the good feelings later, because those won't go away, but that frustration and hurt needs to come out in order to remember how freakin' awesome we are.
24 And Jehu drew a bow with his full strength, and smote Jehoram between his arms, and the arrow went out at his heart, and he sunk down in his chariot.
"Treat others as you would wish to be treated."
This is entirely speculation, but any way I see it, the only certain thing about this is the numbers. They don’t lie.
well, at least your outfit did, ben.
There are three categories of AVSD, complete, partial and transitional. Zoe has a complete Atrioventricular Septal Defect, also known as a "common AV valve". Rather than having two separate mitral and tricuspid valves, Zoe has only one valve over a large whole between all four chambers. As a result, the heart has to work even harder than it already is with the HLHS to get blood to the lungs and rest of the body. What does this mean for Zoe's specific case? I honestly don't know much but the Pediatric Cardiologist said that the common AV valve will only be a problem when it begins to leak. If it does leak before she is finished with the 3-part surgeries, Zoe would no longer be a candidate to continue that plan of treatment and would then only have the option of a heart transplant. We always knew that after the 3 surgeries, a heart transplant would most likely be in her adult future but now my biggest fear is that she will need a transplant as an infant or in her younger years. A heart transplant is her only backup option for success and if she can avoid a transplant until adulthood, she has a better chance of a longer lasting heart.
I think it's a good idea to review and rethink what we do every so often. Without noticing, we slip back into old ways and bad habits. Having our own review keeps us on our toes. Hanno and I are concentrating on four key areas at the moment - the 50 percent meat reduction, which is going really well, getting the entire vegetable garden planted and productive, decluttering and reorganising our bedrooms, and our food expenditure. I'm pretty sure some of you will need to check these areas too, so all this week, I'm going to write about those four things and hope you follow along with your own review and adjustments.
1/2 C. creamy peanut butter (I think crunchy would be good too)
Without further adieu, here is our little project!
5:48AM. Still no alarm.
1.) New Belgium's Mighty Arrow Pale Ale
After a Smart Meter was installed in this Florida woman’s home she said the meter “caught fire and fried my beautiful new kitchen” – over $31,000 in damages to many of her home appliances. The Florida power company refuses to take the blame. See this video: Help Me Howard, FPL Smartmeter
“And where did you get your information?”
I’m very happy that it was possible to fix it.
I would furthermore say that by the failure of President Obama to have taken this step last month he has already violated his oath of office. One of the laws he is required to faithfully execute requires that he prevent the debt of the United States from being questioned. Yet by his inaction the debt of the United States is, right now, being questioned--and is being increasingly questioned more and more as time passes.Upyernoz / rubber hose: platinum, baby, platinum
“Congratulations on thoroughly embarrassing yourself today by acting like a 15 year old. With all RIM is doing and has shown with bringing devs and games to the Playbook and BB10, for you to spout off about them bringing huge businesses on board like Cisco and Salesforce is beyond shallow and stubborn. Immediately following those announcements they went right into all the new game partners. Good job.”
I thought I would start off nice and slow with this post and this onesie seems to fit the bill. I honestly can't get enough of the truly honest baby clothing out there in the world now (like the onesies about boobs and such). Why exclude the puke, eh? This shop has lots of clever stuff like that for babies and toddlers--have a looksee!
QUESTION: Yes. Thank you very much and good evening. We have many qualified, Hispanic leaders. Which of our Hispanic leaders would you consider to serve in your cabinet?
2. The Man Who Is Utterly Powerless Is Powerful (Matthew 27:32-40)
the russet that finger paints westward skies
After my last post, I took a little time for reflection. It seems necessary in this life to step back and gain some perspective, and some of us need to do this more often than others.
…did it live up to it’s “life-like give” expectations fully? You say it was the “real deal”, can you give us the clinical detail…
So, a few months ago, in addition to butter (my all time favorite food (um, fat), I’ve started using lard. Sourcing, finding, obtaining, and rendering leaf lard seem impossible while maintaining a full time job – so I have taken the short cut of using lard. Of course, in this great country of manufactured food, I also had to worry if my lard was hydrogenated.
Today I bit the dust, I mean the bullet, and made a pot of coffee. Which I did so I wouldn't bite the dust oddly enough. I prefer pinon roast from New Mexico as seen bellow with my leather moccasin boot. But this will do. This will certainly get me back to work.
Often rape is used as a means of control, or shaming, of either a woman or her family (which may "force" the family to kill the woman to "restore their honor"). It can even be used to gain business advantage.
I now go back to Bombay circa 1960. On a cool and crisp evening on famed Chowpatty grounds, Swami Chinmayanand draped in flowing ochre robes was the cynosure of all eyes. His gift of the gab held us spell-bound as he harped on the spiritual significance of our mundane existence. He termed the entire creation a cosmic interplay of names and forms.
1/2 C condensed milk
i was looking through the blog and
Apologies for the lack of posting! BBN got married and went on a honeymoon, thus Brooklyn history has not been at the forefront of our brain. But we're back, just in time to give a nod to this extraordinary lady: Margaret Sanger, birth control pioneer. As the Eagle notes in its paper, today is her birth anniversary (Sept. 14, 1879). She was not from Brooklyn, but she did launch the first birth control clinic in the country right here in Brooklyn:
Anyways, just wanted to let you all know we are doing really good, and loving it so far.... Hope to hear from ya soon!!!
A Tale of Two Seders by Mindy Avra Portnoy with illustrations by Valeria Cis
-- CAV
All critically-inclined researchers, students and professional practitioners are invited to this symposium. A collaboration between the Centre for Lifelong Learning at the University of Liverpool and the Paulo Friere Institute at the University of Roehampton and organised in association with the International Herbert Marcuse Society, the event takes place at theUniversityofLiverpoolon Monday 18 June.
Three strangers meet at the bottom of the hill. At the top of the hill is a solitary, leafless tree.
There are some cool action sequences and chases, and the villain of Ghajini is pretty nasty considering this is a Bollywood film which tend to be tamer I would say.
The grant coincides with the inaugural tour’s only California stop on Saturday, September 11 at Citizens Business Bank Arena in Ontario, which shall be followed by the finale in Las Vegas, Nev. (Thomas & Mack Center) on Sept. 25. Tickets and information are available at streetleague.com
So, as I said at the beginning, I was wrong about David Carr’s piece being the worst possible. And to show that I do learn from my mistakes and know how to adapt, here’s my new take: William Petrocelli’s piece is the worst, most misguided, one-sided Amazon hating missive I’ve seen, so far. See, adaptation isn’t so difficult.
Add to the good news column some changes in the UI program that didn’t get into the deal — or survived only in more palatable forms.
I was thankful that the dough came together quickly, and even happier that all I had to do was grate it into the baking dish after 30 minutes in the freezer. I halved the recipe this time, we’re heading out for a beach vacation in a couple of weeks and don’t need the extra sweets calling my name from the countertop.
Sigur Rós have never been a ‘conventional rock band’. Challenging the listener
Elevated to a national heritage area by the U.S. Congress in 2006, Upper Housatonic Valley National Heritage Area works to build awareness and appreciation of the offerings and history of the 29 towns that straddle the Upper Housatonic River from Kent, Connecticut to Lanesboro, Massachusetts. Housatonic Heritage partners with local organizations and individuals to ensure that the region remains a vibrant place to live, work and visit in years to come.
I know its been a long time since I written you. In fact never, but sensibilities that I should write you become my illusion of fact. You and I were one and the same at birth and then slowly with experience, left turns rather than right turns, and finally booze and electric shock treatments, you left me behind. I don’t know if you were far ahead or far behind, but nonetheless you disappeared. I kept to typing on the little manual typewriter I bought specifically to damage my fingertips for the sake of redemption of the writer’s curse. In the middle of the night there was a cat fight and the mill’s smokestacks hissed steam and I lied there silently and thought of you strolling down the streets of Havana, with bellicose laughter and a cigar half the length of your boxing stance. It occurred to me that maybe you were running from something or maybe you were reaching toward an ideal of manhood that no one could achieve. Of course, any chance to experience a quarter of what you did would measure a man today. It’s just mysterious how a man so strong was taken down so quick. I’m not going to get into cliches of “Living fast and dying young” or “I rather burn out than fade out” mantras of the disillusioned youth of today that just want to kill themselves with drugs and alcohol. I am sincerely baffled as to what happened. I want to hold your hand at your bedside and stare into your distant eyes and intuitively get answers from somewhere deep within your spirit. I’m not just another fan that hasn’t moved on. In fact, I’ve only read two or three of your short stories and one book. I am just a nosy connoisseur of universal truths, half-truths, bitter ironies and plain unjust stupidity. I feel that I know everyone that I come into contact with and their “aura”, “vibe” or “countenance” can shake me like an earthquake underneath the ocean floor or they can boil me like a lobster. I am too vulnerable to be in this world, at least in the city where urban occupants may walk around holding Starbucks in front of them as if it were a GPS. I want old and broken, at least something that resembles a disorder that reminds us that were only a step away from being Primates. Hemingway’s disorder was vibrant and stunk with an Originality ahead of its time. He made no excuse for his unyielding craft and He didn’t falter from taking his life with a singular explosive blast. Amen. And to think that we move forward, when great people leave us, as time covers the holes of existence like new asphalt, and the speed of our own approaching mortality leaves us asking: “What the fuck?”
Contractor Deployment Guide. Procedures for contractor operations within the Department of the Army. Chapters 10 & 11 cover a variety of issues for hostages, including identification, aid, rights, etc. Department of the Army, February 27, 1998
The World's Greatest Spokesperson in the World -
I truly believe that schooling is unnecessary, it is a waste of time and resources...
Clearly the girls are teazing me and a game is in order .But little do they know that there is a single solitary beer remaining in the fridge which I quickly retrieve. Now before I can even open this single solitary beer I am once again violently assulted as they attempt to remove this prize possesion.The game develops quickly from here as this is now a matter of honour,This beer now becomes the single solitary remaining beer in the universe,a strategic resource par excellence, and the possesor thereof is the undoubted,undisputed master of the universe.
So this morning I got up and started looking at this stuff--this yardage of tie-dyed interlock and this book, and I was thinking about my Journal Shawls, the things I used to make out of cotton with images and text and embroidery and beading. They were way cool, but I never really loved them because they were a couple layers of woven cotton = they didn't drape and were too stiff and were really hard to wear. They were more display pieces--and, in, fact, that's what most people did with them when they bought them: hung them on the wall.
In 2004 he astounded the world of reproductive biology by suggesting that there were active stem cells in the ovaries of mice that seemed capable of replenishing eggs throughout life.
Then I have to say
So there you sit. Stuck.
I'm still waiting to hear back from the Diabetes Educator--which was also ticking me off...if it's a big deal, why have they not called to make sure I'm not eating ice cream for breakfast, lunch, and dinner?! So I called the office again today, they said, the person that makes the referrals had be out for two days, so they immediately faxed over my orders and said they should call today or tomorrow...still haven't heard from them today...so praying for tomorrow. If not, I'll call again to get their number. I'm not even sure what to expect when they call. But good thing is, is now I've had a couple of days to figure out some questions to ask.
For me, Easter is about renewal. There are other older myths about this time of year, and whether it is about the Goddess or other stories such as the rebirth of Christ, this time of year is about that: rebirth, renewal, coming back to life after the long winter darkness. Here in Canada, buds are beginning to grow on branches, the tips of Irises are breaking through the soil in gardens, and daffodils and crocuses are blooming. Spring birds such as robins have appeared. The day lasts longer, so that leaving work, I am in light still at 5:30 pm. I am so filled with joy at seeing daylight and the sun at the end of the day! The air occasionally has the scent of the earth on it - it's still below freezing at night, and we haven't had very much rain to release the smell of the earth coming to life, this year. In fact, we are so low on rain and have had so little rain or snow this winter, that we broke the all-time record for least amount of snowfall in a winter. Already our water conservation authority is worried about water levels in the Ottawa River. So while I am enjoying our glorious sunshine and feeling my spirits lift with the increasing light, I am aware that we need rain. This is part of life, and I'm curious to see if we will have a long hot dry summer, or if moisture will find its way to us this year.
While others make their nests inside your heart.
Considering the retail price, also see what is included for your selling price. Generally other extras should be ordered. The Visec safety Method features being previously designed by persons at NASA levels. It could do notices, multiple digital cameras, and it has traveler mode. (Might appear to be a certain amount of overkill with me privately.)
She was fired for “undue familiarity” in 2004 after an inmate called her from Rikers and she denied to probers that she had gotten the call.
in Texas
* Matchbook Story now has a Twitter account, @matchbookstory. You will not find stupid little tweets about what I had for breakfast there. You will find useful announcements re: issue releases, distribution dates, etc. Also, it is my very serious intention to tweet each week's Pick-of-the-Week story. As matchbook stories run 300 characters and tweets are 140, the Pick-of-the-Week story will be serialized in three parts. This is a good thing as most winning stories come equipped with a beginning, middle and end, and should hold our attention throughout, right?
Blather, blather, blather… I can drone on forever and ever. To paraphrase the line from the movie “The Princess Bride,” there’s not enough time for me to explain (to my own satisfaction), so let me sum up:
In accepting the award, I am to tell you seven random things about me. (1) I look forward to Spring and the increase in temperatures – I cannot say that Winter is sorely missed during the warmer months. (2) This weekend we watched a family movie with the girls called “Starstruck”. What a pleasure it was to watch something without violence and mayhem in it. Sweet, clean and innocent would be the words to describe it. (3) For breakfast this morning I had my Strawberry Spring Smoothie with a bowl of fruit. (4) The staff at our libraries are currently on strike – and I am not too happy about it! I foresee myself scrounging for interesting reading material very soon. (5) One of my favourite sounds is the one of children at play in a playground. (6) I do not enjoy lying on the beach all day out in the sun. I would rather explore the environs – especially if I am in a country that is new to me. (7) I savour eating around the table with friends or family. Not only do I enjoy tasting the food, but also the conversation when it flows freely. Nothing is better than conversation with well-read people.
So I actually got a few things done this weekend which I was pretty excited about. I emptied out my hallway closet to make way for painting and new shelves, finished one pantry door with the chalkboard paint and started on the other, put up my Easter/Spring decor, and did a few small projects along the way. I need to take a few pictures so I can share with you guys sometimes this week or next. I even started walking to get back in shape! I was like the energizer bunny over the weekend!
Can you see a 2% increase in yield on cash and marketables. Sure no problem as long as Qualcomm is not a long bond investor which it isn`t. The 2% increase kicks out $520 million in EBITDA. Looking at it another way it`s about 12% of last years earnings. 12% for risk free and near effort free return. If the cash and marketable securities portfolio cannot yield an extra 2% in a rising interest rate environment then the whole cash position strategy will come into question.
Alice-Louise Press provides: Beautiful, original letterpress stationary for your wedding day. From save the dates to the thank you cards and everything in between.
The concert is jointly organized by Launch Entertainment and Contents Storage Group.
Series writer Chris Bunting adds: "I’ve gone to great lengths to do things never attempted, such as making T as close to a super hero as possible while retaining his classic persona. After over twenty-five years of fame, this action icon finally gets a rogues' gallery, and even a new catchphrase. Old and new T fans can expect plenty of other surprises too.
Remarkable photography has been produced by amateurs, enthusiasts and professionals. Labels don't mean anything.
“I also probably should have told you about this,” continued our housekeeper. “But I have seen Jade with money, like when we went to the store last week or to play tennis.”
Livingstone's lavish expenses as London Mayor - from first-class travel to cases of Puilly Fume wine, £260 shoes and a £1.89 coffee -- typical Leftist hypocrite
Well said, Mou.
Tell us a little something about you...
Davis truly liked this approach. Whether or not he would have been willing to credit Rolly for any of it is a different question.
Petrified Monsters
with the color green I choose the green bag and 6 crayons. I colored a different color in each square. Then I modeled thinking aloud a name for the color (and discussed NOT looking at the crayons label- we are coming up with NEW names!). Instead of mint ice cream, I wrote melting mint ice cream cone on a hot summer day, or
Combine all of the flours, starches, salt, xanthan gum, and baking soda in a large bowl. Mix together well and set aside. Using a stand mixer, ceam together butter and oil. Add sugar mix for a couple of minutes until fluffy. Add egg whites and mix for another two minutes. Scrape seeds from vanilla bean and add to mixture, mix. Add 2/3 of the dry ingredients and mix until almost incorporated. Add champagne and remaining dry ingredients. Mix until fully combined, scraping sides of bowl.
Happy New Year everybody! And have fun! Life is not that serious...enjoy!
Ohad Hatzofe, bird ecologist for the Nature and Parks Authority, said that the vulture story has been making the rounds in Arabic internet sites, including Al-Jazeera forums and Arabic military forums. "The subject is receiving great publicity and it is important that Saudi authorities understand that it is not true. There is also an international treaty of nature protection professionals, that forbids doing things like this," he added.
Now, if we are at all interested in reaching Kṛṣṇa’s supreme abode, then we must practice bhakti-yoga. The word bhakti means “devotional service,” or, in other words, submission to the Supreme Lord. Kṛṣṇa clearly says, puruṣaḥ sa paraḥ pārtha bhaktyā labhyas tv ananyayā. The words tv ananyayā here mean “without any other engagement.” So, to reach the spiritual abode of the Lord, we must engage in pure devotional service to Kṛṣṇa.
"I'll see you inside later guys, gotta get a drink in, I'm fucking dry as a whistle!"
Well that is it for me today, I shall be back tomorrow with another card :o)…….plus I shall be sharing my cushion sometime this week too, as I finished it last night and I have to say that I am looking forward to making another one soon :o)…..I really enjoyed!
in private..
Ho usato i Copic per colorare l'immagine e sul fiocco ho aggiunto dei piccoli tocchi di Stickles Star Dust.
Through the mad mystic hammering of the wild ripping hail
Anderson is being held in the Dallas County jail, and a bench warrant has been issued for Sayles, Wilson said. Neither man had an attorney listed in online jail records.
garlic powder (I don't recommend whole cloves. They are delicious, but even 2 can completely destroy the dish. Garlic powder gives you more control)
"mom, take Gary in to use the big mirror" and we go in and the fit is !!!!! Although it is a warm jacket and I am roasting.
“Yes, I understand that you can delegate under s6, but I also understand – if you actually read s6: all of it – that nothing in that section obliges the person to whom you would prefer to delegate, to accept your delegation or direction. At the moment, for reasons explained, the police are not accepting it. So the person remains in your custody, entitled to your duty of care.”
Directly north of Wind Cave National Park is Custer State Park. I’ve read that Custer State Park rivals many national parks in its awesomeness. We saw a variety of wildlife including: bison, prairie dogs, curl horn sheep, mule deer, and burros (check out our slight traffic jam below). Towards the end of our time in the park, we found a picnic area by a lake and had some lunch. It was chilly due to the wind, and it was pretty.
Are any of you doing a Project Pan 10? How are you getting along?
50 10 12.69 N , 78 22 36.84 W
Burr Ridge - This town's party is called :Bubbles, Beach Balls and Big Fun!" It will take place from 6:00 pm to 8:00 pm at Harvester Park, 15 W 400 Harvester Drive in Burr Ridge. People are also encouraged to come early and bring picnic dinners. There will be free ice cream, a performance by Dave Rudolf, and children's activities that include hula hooping, sidewalk chalk, bubbles, beach balls, and more. Police and fire fighters will be there to meet and greet residents. It is free, but families are asked to call and register at (630) 920-1969.
My only issues, now are…
So this is not a right or left, conservative-liberal situation. This is how do we operate in a smart way, understanding that we’ve got some short-term challenges and some long-term challenges. If we can solve some of those long-term challenges, that frees up some of our energies to be able to deal with some of these short-term ones, as well.
Whew
to be pampered. And now, he's ready
A surreal tribal line art styled elephant spirit.
Halischuk is what we call a “silent assassin”. Although not a popular, well-known player, Matt Halischuk has made a name for himself and found a permanent home on Predators ice. Halischuk averaged 15 goals and 13 assists in the 2011-12 season, saving the Predators with a few of those moves. However, Hally’s been a bit quiet in this post season, but he has been nursing an injury.
Then it began to pour and my phone battery died.
A frown furrowed his brow. “I do not believe I am any happier than the next man, nor does it matter to Prince Ewan.”
Fact; I always put a weird face at the end of my sentence when i’m typing. ^,^
by Stephanie
If there is such a thing as a sure hit, the Melbourne Theatre Company's production of The Importance of Being Earnest, starring Geoffrey Rush as Lady Bracknell, is it. The show is all but booked out, although I believe the MTC is holding daily ticket raffles for last minute seats. Simon Phillips's farewell show as artistic director is a remake of his 1988 production, which featured an astonishingly beautiful and ingenious Beardsley set: a giant Yellow Book opened by the butler (I saw Frank Thring in this role, and will never forget his superb loathing as he surveyed the audience) to reveal black and white pop-up sets.
is working with Pitney Bowes, a mail stream technology company, to collect and distribute holiday cards to American service members, veterans and their families in the United States and around the world.
The basis for making my Top 10 list is on how much I wanted to listen to the music, how much I thought about the music when listening to other music or when doing mundane day to day tasks. This list has nothing to do with which album has the greatest impact on its individual or specific genre, but purely on how much love I gave the particular recording. Let it be noted that there is very little separating this year’s top three choices. All three albums have spent extended periods of time on the turntable since making their initial impact on my ears.
After actually giving up at one stage - I had the phone ready to tell a few brewers to put the word out I was selling the kit - we noticed something so obvious I'd missed it. We had that rickity old shed, the one with rats underneath at some time in the past, and woodworm and rot running all the way through it. The reason we'd ignored it was the brewing vessels were too tall for it. Taking pictures of the kit for ebay was when the obvious thing dawned on me. They had over 18 inches of leg that could be cut down.
I was going through my Multiply accounts and I stumbled upon a photo of my former venture in the business world. I was in college then, I all I knew was if I was making more than I was spending; it’s a good deal.
The dinner that wasn’t planned ended up being pretty good!
During final dress rehearsal for Darker Shores, the legs of a wooden doll (a prop) weirdly and randomly fell off and landed on the floor with a clatter backstage, during a quiet moment. Jak and I clapped our hands to our mouths and looked at one another with wide eyes - 'oops!' we were both thinking. One week later, and we are both looking back fondly on the time when a doll's legs fell off - such a small and insignificant mishap. Oh how we laugh when we think of that crazy, crazy day.
The tumble of children went off to the verandah , the older ones supervising the proper progression from cold meats to chocolate spread on an unending supply of crusty rolls . A huge table was filled with food and plates were passed round . The merits of different local hams were debated and one cheese was eaten to the last crumb as everyone enthused . The splendidness of the local baker was universally acknowledged . The plates of macaroons , florentines and chocolates were all enjoyed . It was , after all , a very Belgian occasion .
Since I covered Universal’s The Mummyyesterday, I thought the Hammer version from 1959 would be an interesting choice for comparison. Upon viewing, I note that, like the Frankenstein series, Hammer takes its update into a startlingly different direction which does not quite resonate as well as Universal’s Frankenstein or Dracula films.
6 months?? ;)
The perfect example of this texting paradigm is online dating. Here, two people who have never met can do something they’d probably never do in real life: approach an attractive stranger. Words become defense mechanisms, ways for two people to try and control and otherwise scary (and very real) interaction. There is something strangely business-like about two complete strangers setting up a first date having never once spoken to one another.
ONE PINT OF YOUR BLOOD WILL SAVE THREE PEOPLE. Some of you have a blood type that can save up to FIVE BABIES. But my mom said it best. Your blood saves more than just three people or five babies. It saves their whole FAMILIES.
· $1,495 on cable television.
pippa-anne has also made a Challenge Square. This time it is for our 'Owl Challenge'. As I was saying I didn't know there were so many varieties! All the Squares I am getting in for this Challenge are all so different. I love this little fella and I particularly like the blue background with the stars. It really is lovely pippa-anne thank you!
So I changed gears, and came to school today. The kids were all surprised (but happy). I immediately regretting not finding a wig and wearing my contacts and trying to pull a Miss Nelson is Missing on them, but oh well. Another time.
The strange islands,
Lucy Squires was born March 1st @ 5:00 p.m. She was 7 lob. 12 oz. 20 inches long. She is perfect! Another miracle given to us.
Coloured with copics and prisma pencils
7:00 - Make bottles for daycare, do errands/chores like laundry or picking up the condo that constantly looks like a tornado hit it.
My beloved XBMC has a function to sync subtitles, but it’s more of a fine-tuning thing, you can’t specify a very large offset (last time I checked) and it takes some time to actually reload the subtitles and show you the results.
Very good at sleeping. I can fall asleep anywhere, anytime. And if I wake up early, I can go straight back to sleep. This is a Very Good Thing.
3. Include a photograph of your purse
Joss Whedon is most famous for his television work, (Buffy the Vampire Slayer, Firefly) but he is also well known for his witty writing, slick visuals, compelling action and his love for comics. If anyone was ever suited to bring this massive dream project to life, it was Whedon. But the success of this film would also rely heavily on the talent attached. When it was officially announced that Whedon was directing, Robert Downey, Jr.’s portrayl of Iron Man was the only Avenger that had made an impression on audiences. During Comic Con 2010, (which myself and fellow Fourth Wall member Art were in attendance) the world got a look at the group together for the first time and a little glimpse of what Chris Evans as Captain America and Chris Hemsworth as Thor would offer. But even with the stage being set and everything falling in to place, many still wondered… “Is this really going to work?”
“Whales. Parades. Electricity. And the rest are blank.”
For now, gaining their name remains a quietly observed event.
and hug her literally melt.my.heart!!!
The massacre began shortly before 8.30 p.m. when the white families were forced by the terrorists from their homes and classrooms, and marched to a playing field.
These and other media gatekeepers are searching frantically for something to take the place of the BP-sponsored disaster in the Gulf of Mexico, which is depressing and devoid of sex appeal. They might consider checking out why we're stuck in two wars and being barbecued by huge global banks, oil and drug corporations, and anyone else who knows how to channel legal bribes to political weasels.
$100.00
Reasonable carbonation, light and crisp, slightly herbal and grassy again, cereal malts, lemon.
Do not take your villages lightly.
Rel took a deep breath and took a step towards the Gateway. Normally, stepping through was like stepping through a doorway, but his hair stood on end just being close to it. He closed his eyes and walked through, trying to fight down a shudder.
notepapers ect. on a vintage project."
I replied: ( in what has to be the most clever come hither line in history)
Now don’t get me wrong, I still consider myself a Catholic and still go to my Catholic church too. It is comforting to me because of its sameness. I can let my mind wander and speak to God in my head and not miss a beat of the familiar ceremony. The choir at my church is superb, especially at Christmas time, and I love to just sit and listen. Music and singing move my soul. My Catholic church was a place of refuge for me to go to after my divorce. I would sit in the back row, with tears streaming down my face for the entire service. Some of the regulars would pat my shoulder as I passed by, and gave me comfort. I was too embarrassed to seek professional help or even go and talk to a priest, but felt I got it in the back pew of the church every Sunday.
Why blog?
The reunion came about when I got a call last week from Creep Records. They said that Riot Fest was interested in having us play the one day punk rock festival. When we saw the line-up, when it would be held and where, and that we had enough time to pull it off and how much fun it would be... we were in. The last show we played was in 1998. In those thirteen years since that show, we have received lots of offers to play a reunion show but always turned it down. Logistically it would have been difficult with the three of us living far away from each other-Sean in Oregon, Joel in Philly and myself in North Carolina. But now, with myself moving to New Jersey this fall and with some help to bring Sean in from OR, a handful of people are making it easy for us to do this and we're excited about it.
The rest of the ingredients I used in kind of non-traditional lasagna way too. Sortachef at Woodfired Kitchen suggested making your lasagna Steep & Deep by baking it in a loaf pan. I, for some reason, do not own a loaf pan. The last two that I've had I've ended up donating to the trash because they have been scratched and ended up rusting out. So I asked my dear mother in law if I could borrow one, well okay, two. And she so graciously obliged.
For the articles on the internet we provide the readers also with quotes from other related articles on other, even non- Christadelphian and trinitarian sites. In case we should have to pay extra for it we would abandon such a service. But that way people become limited to know more and to look further or to compare other opinions. We think it is important for the matter of freedom that people should be able to get as much information as possible about a certain subject. Providing free information, either by taking care of presenting free visible articles on several research sites or free encyclopaedic works, like Wikipedia, are important to give as much people as possible the opportunity to broaden their mind and to form their own opinion.
(2) Mode of operation
Our home was in need of a new television, and we were looking at the Vizio VO37LF because of how it could provide different options. We had heard about this television’s abilities and wanted to see if it was as good as all the hype. We found the Vizio VO37LF was perfect for our house because it was budget friendly and had incredible features.
There is not a marriage so far gone that God can not restore it. There is not a broken relationship so crushed that God cannot mend. There is not a financial crater too deep that God cannot help you crawl out of to level ground. There exists NO situation where His Grace is not sufficient enough to carry you through. Oh, the world may tell you that you need to listen to your heart, or do what is best for you, and go forward and not look back, but God says something quite different and He is the One who we can trust to tell us the Truth. He says:
(Well said Akela! I especially love that last phrase….do I hear a plug for emotional intelligence at work here?!)
Amanda
Image credit: www.luismonteirophoto.com
3. Keep On (Christiansen, Oberg) 3:17
There was no Friday Feature today. As much as I like to feature and promote others, I've decided to discontinue this as a regular post. I just need to cut something out and this can be time consuming to communicate with others and make sure I have the post done on time. This post was not getting many views each week either, and no one commented with their opinion last week here or on Facebook, so it doesn't seem to be worth the time it involves.
Anyway, I think slipcovering them would give them the casual feel I'm looking for.
We had so much to be thankful for this year. We have been truly blessed and are looking forward to our Christmas and New Years celebrations.
I was quite disappointed when I didn’t get any response on my previous blog which I wrote with great pleasure and happiness. For once, I thought of stopping to be a part of wordpress.com any longer but see, I’m here. Its not so easy to stop blogging once when you have started it.
Breakfast of turtles brought in
Although the headline value of this sale is €14bn, the reality is that €14bn of liabilities are being sold together with €14bn of assets (probably NAMA bonds) so bidding is likely to be for a fraction of €14bn – remember Santander bought Bradford and Bingley’s GBP £21bn deposit book for GBP £150m back in 2008.
Critics of the government and opposition parties had earlier predicted that the government could not be trusted to implement SURE which some of the critics had described as a “fraud”.
Where my baby brother lay
I have spoken before about just how important it is to believe in yourself and that you have to make a conscious decision that you are going to succeed at what you set out to do. In fact every successful person I have spoken to chose to be successful at what they do. They knew what they wanted and they went for it. But I realize that is easier said than done, otherwise we would all be experiencing high levels of success and there would be no need for a a course like mine…:)
Stearns offers plenty in the way of liner notes, but not necessarily much helpful if you're curious about how the music was put together. Instead — and now this strikes me as odd for a work tied to the composer's own dissociative occasions — the notes are associations: among them to James's Nature Mysticism, to Charles Ives (always a background presence in Stearns's music), to the visual works of Adolf Wölfli, to the natural landscape of his native Massacusetts, and, most specifically, to a series of (to be honest, disturbing) cell phone photos taken in Stearns's new home-away-from, Slovakia. But these associations seem to be tangential, in the way dreamwork often is, and the composer's own description of the music as dissociative has to be taken seriously.
Last Thursday Liverpool’s finest, Kof, performed to an intimate audience at the Notting Hill Arts Club (Yo Yo) showcasing tunes from his new EP, An Alternative Soul.
Books make great holiday gifts, and I happen to know where you can get some great mysteries, signed by the authors!
So yesterday marked our one-week anniversary of Home Schooling. And yes, I'm still getting minor panic attacks when I think of what I've done.
We in Britain would do well to note the fate of that tiny Island race, with a unique and vibrant culture , and wonder whether it delivers in a scaled down form, a warning of what could happen to us. The Fijians are black, we are white, but that is where the difference ends, Fiji is their land, Britain is ours and those who seek to deny those truths are liars.
Researchers looking at what happens after XMRV infection in people also needed an animal model and monkeys are “about as close as we can get to what happens in humans,” says Eric Klein, a Cleveland Clinic prostate-cancer surgeon who was also involved in the study. Read more>>
Nineteen eighty bloody one! My thesis was hanging in tatters. How could I maintain a credible argument when it was based on research that was not far off thirty years old? It was time to accept defeat and start considering the possibility of heading for the local multiplex which, I am told, are nowadays full of big comfy seats and bars. But what to see?
The rumor above is a hoax as the police has confirmed it did not receive any police report on the case.
The blonde lady in front of me had tiny wrists. I was fascinated. They looked like chop sticks. She also talked alot with her hands and I just stared at the tiny wrists while wondering how much force it would take to snap them. I also saw a man take pictures with a pink phone. PINK PHONE? UNACCEPTABLE.
Here’s the deal – Go to Lapbook Lessons for all the details. You will be entering the giveaway there. NOT HERE. Lapbook Lessons is in the form of a ning community so you’ll need to join in order to enter but if you love lapbooking, you’re probably already there. : ) Membership is entirely free so you don’t have to worry about that. They have many free lapbooking resources available that make the craft so enjoyable.
We have 2 fabulous sponsors this week ladies
Sunday You Need Love by The Oblivians
“There must have been some white constituents in Bradford, who, although natural Labour supporters, preferred to vote for the white Catholic candidate rather than the brown Muslim one representing Labour.” (The New Statesman)
I used a Tim Holtz die to cut the cogs from chipboard then layered them up & glued them onto the box, then I covered this old chocolate box in PVA glue & tissue paper then sprayed with Sarah's Sepia Spray ink, I worked the spray into the cover with a foam brush to cover the whole area & it created different shades of sepia as it went over the whole surface.
I've been looking for Carpe Demon for over a year and finally found it. It's always out of stock online and my local used book store had a copy that looked brand new. I hopes it's good or my long search would have been for nothing.
After introductions, including from a lot of new members, we discussed what publishers consider hot currently in children's books, historical research, people's working methods, political correctness, independent booksellers and forging connections.
Come down and say "I never thought I'd ever buy Stalin a beer" as you push a glass into my hand. Though drinking it would be out of character, Stalin being a vodka man. Damn..
And, onto this week's challenge ...
That's true in most cases, but it's not true when it comes to the job of parenting. I've held that position for over twenty-two years now, and I still find myself stumped and faced with new challenges on a terrifyingly regular basis. The perplexities of new motherhood, including figuring out which way to put on the diaper and wondering if you're damaging your child for life because you gave him a pacifier, morph into the problems of wondering if your child is developing fast enough, talking when they should be, learning to walk at the right age, etc.
~ Tylenol is wonderful but it doesn't always make you feel better. Especially when your bum has a big bruise on it and your back may have been dislocated in the process of obtaining said bruise. (see first lesson learned)
It's just a clever name. Maybe it's just me. I'm chained to a bunch of people and I wear funny clothes, too. Sometimes I feel like I'm breaking rocks with a sledge hammer. Or pounding sand.
I never did get the rest of my exercises done.
Accessories: Lucky Limeade and Island Indigo Markers, Daffodil Delight Seam Binding Ribbon, Lucky Limeade Ruffled Ribbon, Rhinestone, Dotted Scallop Ribbon Border Punch, Jewelry Tag Punch, Lucky Limeade Bakers Twine
And then there’s Melvin. I wanted him to “grow” as a human being. As you know from “The SEED” he has a long way to go. Ha. So, I decided to have him become interested in self improvement. Threw in Tony Robbins’ name. Created a “Zen spot”. Hey, I didn’t know until this research that Zen is a Buddhist sect from the 12th century . . . read on if you like:
Pour the cream mixture into the tart pans and bake in preheated oven at 350F/175C for 5-7 minutes. Be sure NOT to brown. Leave to cool. Melt the chocolate in a small bowl over a pan of simmering water. Pour into a piping bag or small freezer bag and snip off the end. Drizzle onto the tarts then top each with a chocolate dipped Physalis. Refrigerate for at least 6 hours, preferably overnight.
Evolution has three forms: material, natural, and cultural. Material evolution occurs when meta-stable energetic conditions give rise to increasing material complexity. While material systems do not value, we can say that material evolution occurs when material systems increase in complexity, because these systems then approach the realm of value exhibited by conscious (and most often living) organisms. In this sense, material evolution proto-values complexity, just as organisms in natural evolutionary populations value complexity, and natural evolutionary populations quasi-value robustness. Cultural evolution is a much more difficult topic, to be discussed at a later date.
John 13:35
5) Feathers
Arco Pendant is a custom order piece for Dawn. She asked me to design a pendant for her: a hummingbird sipping honey from a tulip.
I think like most people... I had natural progression down to smaller leads from when I first started using non-pens. (everyone calls pencils "non-pens" right?) You had your Yellow #2 and it stayed as sharp as you had the energy to walk to the pencil sharpener for.
And to just make the day more irksome, as I was walking around work, my bracelet latch caught onto something and unhooked. When the bracelet fell to the floor I had accidentally lost one of the links to it. I wasn’t a happy camper about this, but I’m sure it is something that I can fix with my jewelry making kit.
Cupcakes or cookie – cupcakes
Me: No, but you're a high maintenance drama queen who freaks out and who is very focused on what he wants even if the other person with you doesn't want to talk about politics.
MPRC: We currently have 40,000 hectares of forest with 400 beneficiaries that are receiving payments for capture of carbon and water, who are registered with the national program for payment of ecosystem services.
What he expressed at the conference represents a retreat from the world that ignores biblical teaching on creation. Ultimately such an approach renders the church’s witness irrelevant. It consigns faith to a ‘spiritual’ realm that has little to do with realities of life.
I bought my jelly jars, and all I needed to accomplish this. Oh yes, at this point the Trout is figuring out the cost of this jam. (I did not remind him the cost of the Alaskan salmon he brought home several years ago) wink wink
It never bothered me to let my daughters watch the Disney princesses because I don’t expect my girls to view them as role models, but I definitely like the new version of Snow White better. I like that she stands up for what she believes in and is willing to fight for what is right.
today we have a sweet giveaway for you from our sponsor, popina swimwear! popina is giving away a bathing suit of your choice to one lucky reader-- just in time for summer, too!
Paredes, Diaz and Poblador, Jesus G. Barrera, Vicente Hilado, and Araneta and Araneta for petitioner.
Getting off riding this wave of orgasmic grey
Hmn. Closer to Hitler than Shakespeare, methinks.
Wow! First time I completed a challenge on the first day! And luckily I did as I've spent the rest of the month in a cast. It's still on, making typing a chore...
First, I combined all of the sauce ingredients in the crockpot. This is a chopped onion, minced garlic, ketchup, vinegar, beer, liquid smoke, Worcestershire sauce, salt, pepper, chili powder, paprika, oregano, and brown sugar. Stir the ingredients together until combined.
8. What is delicious to me? What do I consider unworthy of consumption?
During his GOLDEN PERIOD.
Your words
Guan Eng should explain to the people why is he still staying in the bungalow after three years. How long must the people pay for his luxury?
Genesee Brewing Co. Dundee Original Honey Brown Lager
American Crossroads, a GOP-aligned research firm, used a spoof movie trailer, dubbed “Operation Hot Mic,” to ridicule Obama’s offer of post-election concessions to the Russian government.
This is too old for many, but I had a friend name Judy in college and I gave her the idea to wear a Christmas garland wrapped around her neck like a boa and she went as Judy Garland. I guess your name wouldn’t have to be Judy. Just put the name Judy, on our chest and the garland.
The Malaysian Insider (TMI) captured well the contempt for the AG’s decision: “In the eyes of the Catholic Church, the desecration of the communion is an act even worse than the recent firebombing of places of worship.”
are hidden and twirled.
Chris Martin: aka evil_genius_180:
For all this they sinned still, and believed not for his wondrous works. Therefore their days did he consume in vanity, and their years in trouble. When he slew them, then they sought him: and they returned and enquired early after God. And they remembered that God was their rock, and the high God their redeemer. Nevertheless they did flatter him with their mouth, and they lied unto him with their tongues. For their heart was not right with him, neither were they stedfast in his covenant. But he, being full of compassion, forgave their iniquity, and destroyed them not: yea, many a time turned he his anger away, and did not stir up all his wrath. For he remembered that they were but flesh; a wind that passeth away, and cometh not again.
Like a quesadilla, my sincronizada de pollo was filled with cheesy and meaty goodness. However, the tortilla was thicker and tastier than those of typical quesadillas. Despite its cool name, the sincronizada was a pretty familiar, albeit still delicious, dish. I will definitely be on the lookout for it on my future taqueria quests!
We bought 5 acres with views of the Three Sisters in Central Oregon’s High Desert.
"Self-preservation is the first law of nature, and therefore any state of society in which the sword is all the time suspended over the heads of the people must at last become intolerable." - President James Buchanan
“A study done on behalf of Kingston Technology showed that when polling 450 IT staff in the UK from a global total of 3,000, found that 73% of experienced staff used USB drives without permission, with 72% not mentioning if the data was corrupted or lost. Of the whole group, only half even thought to employ some form of security policy to these devices or showed adequate awareness of risk with these devices.”
The Secret Service was also now investigating a news report that employees allegedly engaged the services of prostitutes in El Salvador on another trip abroad for the president.
We were humbled by the actions of these young soldiers, both male and female. The compound was dry and dusty, as were the well-used looking tanks upon which equally dusty soldiers were relaxing before setting off again into the war zone just half a kilometer away.
I still am on a quest for make up. It's become an obsession...seriously. And it's ok -because it's E.L.F! so I'm not even spending much money. Today, after the BBQ, I planned on going home, but then decided I was going to walgreens to get my mom a cooling mask (she got tattooed eyeliner) and even though she looked SO much better today, I thought it might be a nice thing for her to have... so instead, I went to Target, which I totally feel bad about, because I told my cousin I just wanted to go home (I totally wanted to go home, but target made sense since I needed house items, so I'm hoping she won't stab me next time she sees me...) but anyway....
In this case, the St. Croix Heritage Dancers were performing accompanied by one of the street bands at an evening festival in Christiansted. The light, the mid-street venue, and the music made for a surreal mixture of the old and the new.
LBD by Prada.
== NASA's NIAC explores new concepts ==
Paint - $10.88 (should've gotten the sample size but I got a quart, oops)
The program is itself is the symbol of peace and harmony as six different organization , are organizing this program together.
Feel free to share your top sites and help other people sort the wheat from the chaff.
I lay across the bed, and he rubs Aloe Vera into my smoldering bottom.
Baked ham with a sweet and spicy glaze
Who the hell are you, words are my art
-Foodie Penpals is open to bloggers and blog readers in the US & Canada. If you’re a reader and you get paired with a blogger, you will write a short guest post for your penpal to post on their blog about what you received.
Snow-fairies falling, falling from the sky,
… and scene / divorce.
So there you have it. These are some of the foods I buy and eat on a weekly basis. If you’re still looking for help in the grocery aisles, let me know how I can help by leaving a comment here!
My trembling lips saying,
I won't belabor this point. It's something you must consider for yourself and examine within your own internal framework. With that said, let me return to the concern that a child can't know what they don't know. There's a conundrum. How do we expose our children to the universe of knowledge without teaching them important things in a set order? Well, now you understand intuitively the roots of how curriculum design comes about. Somebody sits down and makes subjective decisions about things and prescribes it for us to consume as CURRICULUM. That makes it easy for those who are insecure in their own ability to decide for themselves what's worth knowing and what can happily be left on the shelf. The experts have handed down the stone tablets and all's right with the world.
What next? Well, I think it's about time I changed the design format of the blog, don't you? It looks like what it is - a very basic template from the last decade. If any of you feel particularly attached to its threadbare orangeness please do feel free to pipe up, but this anniversary has reminded me that I probably do need to pull my finger out and make some changes.
The dream shoes re-sparked my interest, and I went back to the Famous Footwear site to see if the price dropped some more. They did. Now, these babies are $39.99 and I can add my 15% off coupon.
Life moves so fast. I need them so slow down now and again.
I saw a few pieces of lint, and one jiblet of blank paper.
Another bit: Virginia Smyth, my editor at Seattle magazine is now blogging, and she came to my reading in Kirkland at Park Place Books. The audience there got into a great discussion about Seattle nice, whether it's a myth or not, and I shared some of the theories I've been collecting on why we locals are thought to be so standoffish once we get to know you. Anyway, she shares her thoughts here. It brings to mind a conversation I had the other day with a French journalist who is based in New York City. He's a devoted urbanist, but doesn't much like living in Manhattan. One reason, he said, was that in the 18 months he's lived there, no one he's invited to dinner has ever reciprocated. Sound familiar? He's living in nice-olation in the Big Apple.
I projected into the computer room back in my house in Philly. Now understand, these were natural occurances, ones I didn’t initiate. I’m working on controlling it so I don’t wind up in these situations not knowing what to do or how to react. In the computer room I sat, typing or something. Startled by a sudden noise, I turned expecting to see my mother. However, I turned to see a hazy, ghostly apparition of what looked to be a masculine being. I say so because it had a phallic appendage hanging from it.
In Evita, that crowd is also represented by none other than Ché (Antonio Banderas, not a cat here), ultra-popular populist icon. Ché is forever pushing and shoving his way between people, getting beaten up by policemen, standing in factory lines, gazing cynically at the lather everyone is frothing around in. Literally, he stays grounded. And so often voices Jiminy Cricket-like asides, meets Eva in dreamscapes where they discuss what the hell she thinks she's doing, and sometimes - for the help of those ignorant of Argentine (Argentinian?) history - summarizes things.
He tried to match it, but found his voice loud and clumsy in his own ears. "It's fine. Can we get out of here yet?"
I'll just state for the record once again - I control the yarn; it doesn't control me. Much.
Your courage astounds me. When my grief burned hottest, I didn’t let anyone in. I didn’t want to be in a room with anyone else who was hurting, because I couldn’t imagine the space could hold us both. Sunshine violated me, and hope burned.
And dream alone of endless night
Interestingly enough, though, he discovered possible connections between phenomena that he had previously thought unrelated. His conclusions required nothing less than that he suspend conventional Western notions of reality, perception, and consciousness, and that he become more open to a different, less linear, less materialistic, and more ancient way of seeing.
Final straw for Him was last night. I asked permission to enter, but then popped right back out of bed to get something and popped right back in. As soon as I jumped back in I thought "Well shit." I jump out and ask permission. He grants it and just stares at me.
Chill until firm. Cut into pieces and store in the freezer.
Jesus of Nazareth
Buddy's asleep on the porch, a shaft of sunlight is falling on the skeletal remains of my garden, and a most intriguing line has been left under Search Keywords in my stats: "at red lights we press our lips together." And now, I'm looking out the window, trying to remember how long it's been since I kissed someone at a red light. The answer? Far too long.
For my card I have used peace and love hipster from Saturated Canary and she is coloured with copics and accented with stickles. The DP is from DCWV and it is all sparkly and glittery, but unfortunately it doesn't show that well on my picture....typical! I kept this card simple.....I faffed around for ages trying to find some more DP to match my base so I could create some layers, but I wasn't happy with any of them and I think it was because the base layer is so pretty I didn't want to cover it up! So simple it is and I finished off with some ribbon and a waltzingmouse sentiment that I stamped on kraft cardstock.
John Kirby (bass)
List Price: $13.95
Rinse the cabbages and let them drain in a colander.
The American Bladesmith Society (ABS) is a non-profit organization that promotes the art of bladesmithing and certifies journeyman and master bladesmiths. The certification process is very rigorous; candidates must apprentice for three years and pass two tests - a performance test (prove you understand steel well enough to create a performance blade) and a beauty contest (prove you can craft a functional work of art). Last weekend Scott demonstrated his knowledge of metallurgy by acing the performance test. In 2012 he will show his work to a panel of mastersmiths, and, if they give him the journeyman stamp, Scott's marketability as a bladesmith will rise substantially. Two years later, if he passes the master bladesmith exams, his marketability will rise once again.
SUDDENLY our children are unsafe — and it is all technology’s fault. And how GRATEFUL we must be to the TV reporters who dwell and dwell and dwell on the fact that now we parents must be even MORE vigilant, because so many predators are busy using GPS embeds to “cherry pick” (TV’s word) and track down the ONLY kid worth taking: YOURS. Because her smile is so irresistibly sweet!
Little Sprouts Farm Internship
Four were arrested on Thursday evening while the other was arrested on Friday morning.
At that moment the train came and killed the elderly couple who were in the car and two of the three , immigrants. The third immigrant was seriously injured.
“Sensitizing chemicals are those that can trigger allergic reactions,” says Malkan. “We have had many reports of people in stores who use these products who have had watery eyes, headaches and just can’t stand being in there.”
Paris: Sure ... But why I should care what happens to the flies?
All that we are,
"If cask and keg are better suited to different styles of beer, do any brewers vary the recipe of their beer to suit the mode of dispense?"
Why this business would stimulate investor interest is not clear. Its total revenues for the nine months ending Sept. 30, 2011 (its last reporting date) were only $3,562 and its total assets were just $249,884.
- Hafiz
The banner comprises a set of nine 5"x7" letters (the print area is 4" x 5" with a white border) so they can go directly in standard size frames. Or they would look just fine suspended from little clothespins/binder clips, resting on little easels, etc. I've also listed each letter separately as an 8x10 print, as they'd also work well as standalone pieces in a studio or a child/tween/teen's room. (Lots of different possible combos for these letters, so if you have specific questions/requests about certain letter combinations or sizes, just convo me.)
Boy, was I wrong.
So, my friends, I'm not going to apologize for my lack of posts the past few months, but I will give you a little peek of what we've been up to:
Can you believe that the school year is half over? It seems to me that it just started, but our new semester began today. Last Friday was a work day for teachers, and also the day of our second annual Soup Swap/ Luncheon. All morning you could smell simmering goodness coming from crock-pots plugged in throughout the building. It made doing report cards just a little bit easier knowing that the aromas wafting through the halls were previews of what was to come once lunchtime rolled around! While we watched the snow coming down outside, we relaxed and enjoyed a wonderfully diverse assortment of delectable soups, breads and desserts.
E – ‘Building Cycling Culture/s – where do we put the car?’
Returning to France, I spent the next three months banging out a book proposal, so there wasn't a whole lot of visual interest produced around here. In August, though, an old friend from New York invited me to visit him and his wife at her reconditioned farmhouse in the Dordogne. It was a lovely spot, and I shot some fairly good pictures around there, given that sunshine wasn't as readily available as it is down here.
The Future Arrives As Pneumonia Now the end keeps its promise. Now he will not make it to thirty. Now he will drown like farmhouses below the dam, like bottomland inherited and tended by grandfathers, porches swept by grandmothers, certain revered shade trees. Drowning in his inheritance, he says, grinning at the nurse as he begins a backstroke on the bed. He confesses to doing what the dying always do, to dreaming the dead ones close, and dreaming himself a kid among them who they took to what was land between rivers become land between lakes, and up to Devil’s Walking Stick, the hill from where they’d watched it flood back in the forties. They kept talking about the house and they kept pointing into the water and he kept looking down into the water but couldn’t see any barn or house, and none around anywhere. Not a single solid structure. Not a single solid structure, arms stretched out as if now he were floating.
Antiterrorists Imprisoned in the US Send Message to Cuban Women
It was easy to have me and to hold me for the better, but you had me and held me for the worse as well. A lot of worse. Without thought for your own well-being, but for mine. When you came to Family Week at the alcohol treatment center you said, “I thought I was here to help you. If I had known it was to help me, I would not have come.”
05. Hotel Yorba
However, that debate will continue I would like to now consider some of the claims and allegations made during the program, such as whether there is such a thing as an indigenous or native Briton, and whether immigration has brought benefits to this country. However, as these issues which deserve a deeper analysis I shall focus one them in part two of this post
Thy fortunes. How! that I should murder her?
3. all-in-all it's actually pretty good. Not knocking Eternal Sunshine out my top spot, but as good as any rom-com sitcom-y type movie I've seen. Writer/director Vanessa Middleton sounds a little bitter-and-bruised in this interview, but she might have reason:
Read and let read~
That I wasn't a good enough lover
My mother-in-law's side.
distinction between them and the rest of mankind. Even as their Lord was
- For me, probably Hot Water Music or Kid Dynamite. They were two of my favorite bands growing up.
Audiences can now ‘roam’ in ways never imagined. Their experiences stretch across remote desktops and into virtualised applications, then back again into the physical. We are interested in submissions that either encourage or investigate these notions of movement across the physical and virtual.
“We have a new story of the universe. Science has given us a new revelatory experience. It is now giving us a new intimacy with the earth.”
Finish: Medium on golden syrup, oak, a little poppy seed and cinnamon.
How to make your body a home? It starts with loving yourself. What does that mean? Do you make decisions that honor you? Are you gentle with yourself? Do you forgive yourself for making mistakes? Do you have compassion for the areas in your life you want to change or do you constantly analyze and critique yourself? Do you blame yourself for the past and have guilt and regret? These emotions destroy your house. What qualities make a home? LOVE. When there is SELF LOVE you will make decisions that honor your body. You will make decisions that help to grow and nurture your body not decay and destroy it. When you really love yourself you won’t make decisions that harm your body. Self Love honors and respects the space it resides in and takes care of the space that houses the soul. It is a form of devotion. Think of your body as the temple that stores the soul. So daily cleaning must be done to keep your house happy!
Eventually D came out with “I don’t have an answer for you- I haven’t really thought about it.” Really. Really? Seriously? You know I have a kid, and that she is always going to be around, and if you want to be a part of my life she will be a part of your life too! The thought never crossed your mind? Really. He also went on to say that he felt it was sort of “early” to be discussing the subject.
“ … until I became dissatisfied with everything, with every creed, with every dogma and belief, I was not able to find the Truth.” Krishnamurti
1-2 The Skaters – .:~:~:. 10:56
Also, now added is a currency converter at the top of every page, for pounds, euros and dollars, for extra ease.
yesterday was a joke. i'm tired of the mundane. i need something new. i need to be happy. and right now, i'm just not. and it all boils down to one thing that i spend 8 hours a day doing, and spend probably the remainder of my day stressing, worrying and bitching about. i'm just tired of it and need to find a way out.
A lot of thing to do for school,and some in groups and with presentation to the entire class(wich I hate)and wating to my chemistry's grade in the last test(worst test so far in this year and maybe in my entire life)...
The Simply Scored Scoring Tool makes it easy to score the 3" square into a 1" grid to do the faux tile. Then stamp and highlight the edge of each "tile" with some sponged on color. In this case I used Crumb Cake. The background is rolled on with the Love Blossoms wheel.
My new stamp this month is the Diamond Backgrounder - I stamped it to be my skyline backdrop again the Echo Park Yours Truly 12 x 12 stickers. Then I embossed the base of the circle with the Swiss Dots Cuttlebug folder - one of my all-time greats!
While the middle of Twin Peaks was a bit of a mess, it is impossible to deny all that it brought to the table. Creator David Lynch’s greatest strength has always been his inability to view the filming process as everyone else does. Sometimes that produces bizarre, unwatchable fare. Sometimes it finds something great that everyone else had been missing all along. With an attractive cast that featured talent of all ages, plenty of soapy conventions, a murder mystery, and the supernatural thrown in, this show was revelatory. Of course much like Heroes the good was unsustainable. Lynch stopped being a creative force for the show and much of the magic that was present in the first season was squandered as plotlines were burned through with stunning speeds. Lynch returned to direct the finale, which brought back a bit of the outsider’s perspective that had got things going, but sadly a show that could have been one of the all time greats was merely just very good in retrospect.
Joe R. Lansdale – Godzilla’s Twelve Step Program
Austin came home from school one Friday talking about how he was going to have a party.
Defenders Ritchie De Laet and Ryan Shotton are both at League Two side Bournemouth with views to loan moves.
¾ tsp. vanilla extract
A lot of people I have read tend to focus only on the first part, and here's the gist of what they say:
School will be done in a week and a half for me. Thursday I am going to sign up at a short order staffing office to try and get a job or two for the summer. My dog “Wizard” turns 11 on Friday. I hope he gets his Hogwarts acceptance letter in the mail. My cat “Warrior” is six and she is still as ornery as ever.
Sometimes life in rural France can be perplexing. The approach to tasks, that I take for granted and presume require no explanation, can so easily be misconstrued here. I am not talking about language and vocabulary but about a mentality that is so totally foreign to my own. This is not a good or a bad thing, just different. I am smitten with all things French and have been for many years but sometimes my mind does a little flip when faced with 'French farmer logic'.
4.Tag your entry EBWC. This is how we find your entry. Please test this tag by searching "handmade" and "EBWC" on Etsy. If your entry does not appear in this search within an hour after listing and tagging it, please contact a moderator for assistance. Please do not apply this tag until after the previous challenge poll closes on the 15th, and remove the tag after the voting poll closes, so entries for the next month’s challenge can be featured.
My main problem with Voyager (aside from everything) is the cast. I found very few cast members who grew on me or inspired my sympathy. While I enjoyed Captain Janeway, I did not enjoy many of the other characters Cha’Kotey, B’Ellaina, Ensign Kim, and even 7/9 never seemed to grow on me. Though the more I watch it, the more I feel for 7/9. Neelix and Kess were the low points in the show. While attempting to add alien eccentricities all these characters did was cause unneeded problems, and further my dislike for other characters as they began to friend and trust these two. Paris and the Doctor were the only two characters whom I can honestly say I enjoyed. Paris’ character got better and better, and the Doctor added much-needed comic relief and added the ambiguous factor. The ambiguous factor being a character who doesn’t understand humanity, for what ever reasons. The Doctor follows, Spock, Data, and Odo on this list. This leaves me with Tuvok. The vulcan who shouldn’t have been. Spock, while campy at the time, was the ultimate in terms of the vulcan race. Since his characterization others just fall flat. Tuvok was not a horrible character, just predictable, and underused while being overused all the same.
Imagine if God’s Son went on such feelings, and “inner peace”?
Gracing this occasion were Ningbo Feng Hua Municipal Party Secretary Rong Xuehai, Sinopacific Shipbuilding Group Chairman and CEO Simon Liang, Sinopacific Shipbuilding Group Executive Manager Lin Bo, and representatives from other government departments, the bank, the shipowner, and the ship inspection department.
It’s not long before Wyatt and Calliope are keeping each other warm on cold December nights. But it’s going to take a Christmas miracle for Wyatt to put his trust in love a second time.
Spain is the avant-garde of design. The country introduced architectural wonders such as the Sagrada Familia in the late 1800s, which has spilled over into the 21st century as one of the most innovative museums; The Guggenheim. One can argue that Spain has always been eccentric. Historically, the Iberian Peninsula was once under the rule of Islam and during this time period engineered magnificent mosques, like the Mezquita in Cordoba. The Muslim, architectural influences can be seen across the country. For centuries Spain has been a pioneer who has introduced the world to new and unusual or even experimental ideas, especially in the arts. There is an unspoken beauty.
Tensions remain high in an Egyptian village where several thousand Muslims went on a rampage on February 12 over a false rumour that a church was holding a 14-year-old girl against her will in order to convert her back to Christianity. Sources said that between 2,000 and 5,000 hard-line Muslims, most of them from the Salafi movement, harassed Christian villagers in Meet Bahsar in the Nile Delta, attacked a church building to "save" the girl, damaged a priest's house and then destroyed his car. The girl was not in the church.
It talks about comfy clothes, pillows, a going home outfit for your baby, snacks. Well my friends. No one told you about the after-birth checklist. In fact unless you have that really good friend that tells you what your body is like after giving birth and it's your first. You have no idea!
What are your thoughts in this respect that India is willing to pay for Iranian oil with gold?
Home. I have recently started calling New York home. I didn’t grow up here – I’m from Los Angeles – but at a certain point, that receded into the background. I think New York is home now.
WEEK 1: Kitchen Organization–countertops and sink
This is actually SCF Fibre Club and Spunky Club hanging out together. There’s 8 ounces of Bond in Terrestrial from Southern Cross Fibre, and 8 ounces of Merino in Little Fishes from Spunky Club. They’re together because I’m planning a combo spin with these two.
From everlasting to everlasting
When real snow is too cold, paper snowflakes have always been a festive alternative. When you’re trying to save paper, the best way to make paper snowflakes is on your iPad. Just download the free app Paper Snow, and you’ll be making snowflakes in no time. Just cut out your snowflake, and you can share it with Twitter, email it to a friend, or save it to your Camera Roll. It’s great to kill time. Grab it from here.
The class is like a mini art class about landscape painting, we just happen to be working in wool creating felt. For me this hybrid felt is very much like the process I was doing when illustrating. The wet felting gives the look of the watercolor under-paintings that I started the illustrations with. I would then further develop and add detail to the piece with colored pencil which in this case is the needle felting. I start the class with a long (I try not to be too long winded) lecture about the basics of rendering a landscape; things that would apply to any colored medium. I teach how our use of color, value, line, and perspective can give a great sense of depth to a painting. I discuss how to look at the inspirational photo and break it down into simplified masses and how to truly see what is there. My greatest wish is for students to leave with a new way of seeing. I then talk about how the use of wool and various fibers and the felting techniques can be used to create something very unique in landscape rendering. The felt itself is more than just a flat canvas; the surface of the felt can be built up much more than if we were just using layers of paint. Students do the wet felting on the first day and then make changes and add details with the felting needle on the second day. Students may not leave with a finished piece but they have the basic knowledge of how to render a landscape.
to rest upon
Born Again by Third Day
Keith asked why I didn’t try out for that spot…and I didn’t really have a good answer for him. Haven’t gotten behind that particular microphone since the GCW days and wouldn’t mind doing it again sometime!
However, any optimism was to be short lived. Now, after just 14 years of rule by Mandela and his grim successor Mbeke, corruption is rife, the country is beset with power cuts and the infrastructure is crumbling.
Depeche Mode Personal Jesus x UK
The Bug runs away
But the play, as a whole, somehow transcends them and works for me. The basic plot of Pericles, while all over the place, is nevertheless easy enough to follow. And in the last three acts, you encounter some of Shakespeare's best lines and most affecting scenes. How could that not be worth it?
Yep Quiet. I am not sure how to adapt to this new "Quiet" house. The 5 older kids started school on Monday. Kassi started full day Kindergarten. And even Caden has Preschool from 11:45 to 3pm. So after he leaves the 2 babies go down for naps and I am almost at a loss as to what to do with myself (besides the obvious cleaning). It is amazing how much you can get done with no kids underfoot or messing things up as quickly as they are cleaned.
I love looking at everyone's projects
To me it represents innocence and timelessness.
The boom operator and camera operator need to work together to make sure the mic stays out of camera shot.
And, my summer's 'round the bend heartstrings are being tugged on by the tennis theme but, then again, how will I feel come fall? Hmmm...okay, so which TWO needlepoint glass case patterns would I like to go with my new swanky scissors???
“I’ma test this out…” admits Badu at the beginning of this track, copping to the fact that she intended to cover the Rufus classic at the Soul Train awards show, but “got scared.” She then proceeds to absolutely kick the type of performance that will make the hair on the back of your neck stand on end.
Using a few charming vintage elements from my baby book, I put my page together…
And it don’t matter to me
It’s getting to be a lot warmer here in the southeast so I like to serve a lot of lighter salads and grilled fare for dinners. We tried a recipe for a buffalo chicken salad and it was really yummy and completely gluten-free. The chicken strips were juicy and the salad had all the yummy flavors of a buffalo chicken sandwich just without the bread.
Roy: I’m asking you–who’s in goals?
“It tastes like you’re drinking from the bowels earth, like frankincense – it’s beautiful.”
being unfair, we’ll be a prisoner of
9. This week I didn’t care about those downsides in Paradise, the sometimes rude behavior people show here, because ‘Timan’ is healthy and happy, the Hubs is healthy and happy and the Mommy is healthy and happy. Oh, life is good.
No Jesus Christ
Dessert was a tasting plate of three different delights from fresh, tart berries to chilli-laced mousse which was paired with some carefully cellared Surefoot Stout. This alone would have been a finish befitting the tone of the night. But, in a taste of things to come, the expectant guests soon discovered that when you commit to a Beer Dinner at Beer Deluxe hosted by Prof Pilsner, well, expect the unexpected!
Dr Seuss' How the Grinch stole Christmas ... Cartoon Network (east) ... 11:30 AM
Pour into a greased loaf pan.
Well, i am going to be starting to write reviews for indie authors from my forum.
its earth. And you squeezed it, to show me
The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes
So, when anomaly hunters approach an idea that’s actually pretty solid and widely accepted – say, that 9/11 was perpetrated by a band of Islamic extremists, or that ghosts don’t exist – they might pick up on some small factors that seem at first glance not to fit perfectly with the established explanation – say, that “fire can’t melt steel”, or that there’s something strange in your neighbourhood – and use these to call the established explanation into question. The very fact that anomalies exist – in this sense of strange-seeming things that can’t be immediately explained – is held up as evidence of the weakness of the prevailing theory.
I'm on 'restricted activity' for a while, so I went to the school today but mostly sat and did light activity. I wasn't very productive, but had some quality time with a couple Renaissance kiddos (lots of laughter there) and a parent-night meeting this evening. Tomorrow: Enrollment! Morgan has been moving quite a bit today and yesterday, and I've done a much better job at keeping a regular schedule (eating, getting up, etc.). This has been one of my major priorities since I've been sleeping in quite a bit and eating at odd times. I don't want to confuse the poor thing!
It then looked like this. The next step was to snip into the lower layer and bend down to create the lid and add a thin strip of card round the edge so that the lid fitted neatly over the bin.
You will have until April 25th to complete and get your shoes mailed to me:Please try your very best to stick to the date~~ I know I look really forward to getting my swaps on time and it just stresses us all if we are late! I know situations arise.. but pretty please try!
If this is true, then no one has written textbooks for the requisite mathematics yet. We might as well be kindergarteners from Medieval times seeking the solution to a multivariable differential equation. Like Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy so blithely suggests, perhaps our universe was created as a computer to calculate the solution to this infinitely complex equation. God is in the details of chaos, and entropy pushes the entire universe toward godliness. This current of the underlying universe is one of God’s original axiomatic processes – monads – that run the Universe – belonging with the speed of light, Gravity, Maxwell’s electromagnetic theorems and like charges attracting unlike charges. These monads, and the ones we haven’t picked up on yet, are the prime tenets upon which God’s creation is run.
from each other and ourselves
Forgive us our sins, as we forgive those who sin against us
* Effective communication both verbal and in writing
"So, Heir Gvessen, vat vas it zat made zis house not to your likingk? Tell me, tell me...VAT VAS it? I'm vaiting, give me za answer!" All the while smacking her riding crop into her leather gloved hand... Then Indian Jones comes swinging through the open door, snatching the couple up and delivering them to safety. While they were being whooshed away, the wife said "the ceilings are too low upstairs..." Yep, that's how it happened!!
Grace will come and clear your path
The police were the first to arrive. I have no idea what the police officer said. I just could not understand what was taking the ambulance so long. Evan told me to get dressed. I was soaking from the night sweats. I changed my clothes.
Once the time is up, take them out, turn them over and cook for another 8 to 10 minutes. My wings (that sounds so corny!!) are done in exactly 17 minutes. If i want a more charred look i keep it a little longer but be careful, you dont want to burn it (been there done that, plenty of times..ha)
I also volunteer time each week to help our church’s education program and youth group. Much of that work involves writing curriculum, drafting messages and other online tasks and is squeezed into “free” evening and/or weekend hours.
We enjoyed each other's company and spending time together with yummy food. Oh, wait; there are other happy makers my kids always look forward to. The mint chocolate. :)
permanently away from you
In 2006, a 17-year-old polytechnic student Garyl Tan Jia Luow was arrested by the police and subsequently charged with piggybacking on someone else’s wireless Internet connection. He was let off with three months’ probation.
She's had such a rough upbringing being beaten by nuns and living with certain dysfunctional family members could really screw someone up.
Jinguk gets all quitty on his friends Samdong and Hyemi, and says he won't perform in the fake showcase with them. Hyemi feels betrayed because singing together onstage was a shared dream of theirs and it meant a lot to her. Even with one missing class member, Hyemi pulls a Scarlett O'Hara and basically buffalos everyone into doing the fake showcase anyway.
So depending on the individual, their Religious Movies in their minds can be uplifting and lovely; or a nightmare horror. And everything in between.
10:42 PM – Brock Lesnar’s music hits, but Cole tells us that Brock has declined to attend Monday Night RAW and his legal representation will instead address the fans. Who is this legal representation? PAUL FRIGGIN` HEYMAN! Yes, you heard me! Now that I have finished freaking out, I understand that Heyman is telling us that Brock feels betrayed by the fans. He goes on to read an official statement from Brock. The long and short of the statement is that Brock Lesnar quits. Wow. I am actually a bit shocked by everything that has just taken place, which is the most exciting thing to happen to me all day! And it was amazing to see Heyman! Now if only he would stick around a while.
Here are some pics. Even though I took my fancy camera, the lighting made it quite tricky. I don't have all the names of the contestants either, so I'll add them as I find out!
She became auntie to my furbabies and helped me paint my dining room. We have wicked car ride karaoke sessions and had fun girl nights with makeup and chick flicks.
Steamworks Brewing Co. Third Eye P.A.
Peace which passeth understanding’ is a feeble translation of the
the country club,
*Please write your own post, link back to our blog & donation page if possible
A while back I came across a website by an American cyclist named Sheldon Brown and it really is as close to a bible for a bicycle as you’ll get. Sheldon sadly died in 2008 but the website lives on and is still being updated. One article on the site was an enthusiastic post on single-speed bicycles which I thought was interesting but not really my thing. I was still convincing myself that I’d be riding along the trails and bridleways of the South Downs every weekend, when in fact I wasn’t and had binned my off-road tyres a year before.
“But let the godly rejoice. Let them be glad in God’s presence. Let them be filled with joy” (Psalm 68:3, NLT).
What do you care about? The question that always comes to mind when you think about the word care. The definition for caring for me is reaching out to someone you love as you would do for your self. We had a conversation on what do we care about and the more we went deeper the more I thought about what do i care. I do care about my family and friends but caring can be for other things besides people. I care about my school that I to to and I care about my sports. I think my mom takes a big part in this because she car about her job, she wants to be ale to do everything right and she is always on task. I also think love has a part in caring because when you love someone you start caring about them and reaching out to them. Caring also takes action and when you just say I care for someone but don’t do anything that’s not caring but if you do show action then people will realize that you do really care. Love is caring and caring is love so take action and reach out.
Or flat upset them
fruit/veggie scraps
7 small potatoes
I have emptied out every room but the kitchen and our bedroom and vacuumed every corner. Only putting back in what is needed. Last week when I was laying in bed I remembered we were missing a little toy of Katie's for months. Can't find it. Then I started thinking that once Caleb was here what happens if he wakes up in the middle of the night and I don't hear him. What if he starts going through the room and gets into something he could choke on....like that little toy!
The UN last week released the first ever World Happiness Report.
10) World War III Starts
Select disk devices to encapsulate:
Meanwhile, over at the Guardian they can actually report some solid new sightings of Cap’n Plod’s continuing attempt at damage limitation to the multiply-torpedoed Metropolitan Police.
Wed - Homemade Noodle Soup with chicken. A twist on your classic chicken noodle, this one come with homemade noodles blended with a homemade broth with carrots, onions, and garlic, and some extra special seasonings, all minced into the soup broth so kids and adults can't help but eat their veggies
Please give us a little background about yourself, i.e., family, education, hobbies, etc.
scones (homemade)
I almost always go in here for browsing purposes only. Sometimes for inspiration.
3. there was compassion for each other—no sense of competition, no sense of conflict (personal or ideological). When we are all facing the same target, with arms linked together, we can go further and stronger. We celebrate each other’s successes and share each other’s sorrows. That’s what teams do–they win together, and they lose together. (How does your team function right now?)
Do we make the choice to simply fit in? Or do we make the choice that’s not the norm? We may be in pain. We may be suffering. We have a choice to take that step forward. We have a choice to not give up. If you want to do something today, do it! Who’s stopping you?! We were all created for a purpose, a purpose much bigger than the negatives or putdowns of people that told you, you couldn’t do something.
In sympathy for others, he would pop up in advance of blog posts and mutter those immortal words: "Yaargh! Here be spoilers!" before vanishing into the night.
Of course you know that I was not kidding. Later my friend understood what I meant. Thanks to God and thanks to Skype. (smile)
Week 2: Subtly Yours ~ soft, romantic colours
So this whole logo thing is something I heard about before I arrived to UND’s campus three years ago and something I was not looking forward to having to deal with. Yep, I said dealing with.
Also from the world of entertainment, for fans of Lucille Ball there’s I Love Lucy: A Celebration of All Things Lucy by Elizabeth Edwards ($30.00, Running Press), a big coffee-table book out this month for the 60th anniversary of her television show and what would have been Lucy’s 100th birthday. It is filled with everything one could imagine or hope for regarding the show and its star, photos, character bios, music lyrics, and even recipes featured on the show. Many of the unforgettable episodes are presented in thumb-nail sketches. The author has worked with the Arnaz family since 1992 and this is the culmination of two previous Lucy-related books. For those of a certain age who look back fondly on this television icon and the laugh-filled show that is still in re-runs today, there’s a lot to enjoy.
Identify what is “social” about your business: Think about your business and write down all of the actions that you or customers that you take that are inherently social. Maybe it’s the content that you’re always creating. Or it’s the unique way you use customer feedback. Or how customers naturally share your products in their network. Every business has those organic social touch points. It’s your job to identify them and look at how you can leverage them.
‘It takes less time to learn how to write nobly than how to write lightly and straightforwardly’, by FRIEDRICH NIETZSCHE.
These grants usually incorporate a group and/or community project that features some aspect of the humanities.
Guess what? She is available as a sculpture Christmas ornament too, from the Bradford Exchange! She comes in a set of three - all Ruby and two of her sisters, each with little dragonlings in holiday decor. Only $29.97 for the set of all three - less than $10 each - and you can get guaranteed Christmas Delivery! Click below to see:
Taken: 09/29/2010
Happy reading, writing or whatever: )
This game was released just one year after I was born, 1992, and it was one of the first games that my awesome father introduced me to. I remember it barely fitting on a floppy disk, and now there is a version which can fit onto an i-phone and another that can be played directly in your internet browser. Oh how far we have gone!
Tommy said that he promised Dixie they wouldn’t fight right now cause if they didn’t, they would be in the ring beating up Fortune. Then Tommy and Flair go back and forth, it’s not quite like it was with Flair and Lethal, but it still was funny.
Here is a sneak peekie.
4. Out Of Limits - The Marketts
A1: "And there's a story about me, too."
Introduction by Calum Laird, Commando Editor
When one party moves this far from the mainstream, it makes it nearly impossible for the political system to deal constructively with the country’s challenges.However, like Think Progress, I thought the pair's advice to media at the end was equally important and deserves much more attention. We understand the values of mainstream journalists, including the effort to report both sides of a story. But a balanced treatment of an unbalanced phenomenon distorts reality. If the political dynamics of Washington are unlikely to change anytime soon, at least we should change the way that reality is portrayed to the public.
tomorrow is D-day. All packed (ish) and ready to go! Wishes of luck and prayers much appreciated (particularly the latter) – going anywhere new alone is always a bit daunting and is especially so when there’ll be the language barrier, and the staying-in-uni halls (a new experience for me!)
From the red clay of Stuttgart to the blue clay of Madrid, Maria Sharapova continued her strong play in the first round of the 2012 Mutua Madrid Open by routing Irina-Camelia Begu, 6-0 6-3. Most importantly, Masha brought her strong service game with her. Both players had 79% first serve percentages, but that means a lot more for Sharapova than Begu, as Masha won an astounding 88% of points on her first serve. She was never broken in the match while breaking Begu 4 times. Obviously, the path gets more difficult as Masha advances through the draw, but but coming off her title at the 2012 Porsche Tennis Grand Prix it’s good to get the first match in Madrid out of the way quickly.
And if you haven't already had a glimpse of the gorgeousness ... this may be just a great time to pop over and have a look ... cause she is also having a great giveaway from Anthropologie. A great place to shop if you are headed out to the US ... as for me ... I'm hear in Gurgaon drooling over these salad plates ... that are making me go all ... Uuuuuuuuuuuuh and ahhhhh ... ;)) ... Have a great giveaway Priya ... and for all my readers ... Happy discovering another beautiful blog ... :))
PETA’s Welfare Campaigns Contradict Animal Rights
There have been instances where menus have been an undeniable factor in restaurant success and failure. Wording in a menu can be the difference in customer expectations including: how much people order, what people order and how people ultimately judge their meal. A menu that reads like a book can be intimidating, tiring and confusing for diners – which can lead to a situation where the words may ultimately overwhelm the food. A menu that reads too minimalist can be too vague and uninformative – leading to improper interpretations/expectations of what is actually written versus what is actually served. The dream menu should have the perfect balance of food seduction and honest expectations, which is honestly impossible.
I haven´t been here in such a long time…but today is such a wonderful day and all i can see is a story…a story of a kill…is the story in which i am willing to die so to get out from this bubble of fear i have started to gather.Today is gonna be a shadow story…a story lost in long long forgotten time.
Starting in 1829, Watchmen were required by New York City ordinance to call out fires. If they saw smoke, the Watchmen would scream out either the name of his post, or the street of the fire. There was a also street curfew that stated anyone seen outdoors after 9 pm were considered to be of “bad morals.” It was the Watchmen’s duty to arrest anyone they caught wandering the streets at night, then bring them to the local jail, to be locked up until daylight. The Watchmen’s pay was a mere $1 a night. They were also paid an additional fifty cents extra to attend as witnesses at Special Court Sessions, to testify as to any particular crime they may have seen while on duty, which hardly ever happened.
Movie Review:
I enjoyed a slab of dark coffee cake, served with a generous drizzle of melted chocolate & vanilla ice-cream.
The NRO was issued by Gen. Musharraf on a condition that he would continue himself as the President whilst abandoning his post of COAS and Benazir Bhutto as his Prime Minister. Even after the assassination of Benazir this pact was very much intact as PPP decided to appoint a new PM after the sympathy victory in the General Elections.
If your Burger King still has the Family Bundle you may want to check it out. Now, I'm not saying to eat it all of the time but it is a nice treat every once in a while. It's easy, convienent, tastes great, and it's affordable. Oh yeah, the new french fries are really great too!
But there are also historic sites that are chillingly ordinary. Just another house on a suburban block. Nothing unusual. Any of us might have grown up there.
She was drawn to an ancient Chinese
It might be argued that this is all well and good when it comes to society at large, but should it apply to our children attending school? Shouldn’t they be, you know, protected from hate? Again, I see more good in protecting free speech. First of all, it is impossible to be objective about what speech is “bad.” People will always label speech that threatens their views as “wrong” or “offensive,” regardless of whether there is any truth to that claim. More importantly, children should be full participants in the democratic free exchange of ideas – we can’t expect them to handle ideas they find odious with maturity or sensibility if we do not teach them this skill. The Supreme Court over the years has spoken strongly in favor of this principle [emphasis mine]:
This is not an action movie, this is an intense character study with action beats. If you can keep this in mind then you’re already ahead of the game when watching this movie. Drive gave me the same buzz as Heat, a beautiful film, a deep film, a film that didn’t shy away from some of the more violent aspects of human nature. When I left the cinema I knew that this would be my number one film of 2011. Ryan Gosling’s performance is great, so subtle and yet if you pay attention you can see a lot of what is going through his characters head. I can’t wait for this movie to come out on Blu Ray as I’ll watch it back to back with Heat. That’ll be a great night.
I have been photographing some of the sun birds which are regular visitors, to name the malachite and Lesser Double Collard. The Double Collard Sunbirds have a magnificent plumage this time of year whilst the Malechite’s full bright green coats have not finished developing.
Cool on wire rack for 15 minutes. Invert a serving platter on top of the cake pan. Flip the cake out onto the serving platter. Set aside.
Some Web sites may not be displayed correctly or work correctly in Windows Internet Explorer 8. There is a KB956197 on Microsoft site, explaining this problem.
“Are you deaf? There ain’t nothing on this fucking card.”
• As part of the 'In Performance at the White House' PBS series, Obama hosted B.B. King, Mick Jagger and a host of other music luminaries for another of his posh, weekly soirees.
The new owners realize this. But here's where, so far, they are showing signs of significantly missing the mark: by trying to make Adweek part of the New York media industrial complex. That complex is an obsessive, gossipy place, where mastheads -- to the extent they still exist -- are closely scrutinized, and winners and losers are as closely watched as Anna Wintour during Fashion Week. But it's also got little to do with what the backroom of the media industrial complex is about -- and that's been the target market for these magazines. Here are a few head-scratching stories I've seen in the magazines, and online, over the last few months:
We have been listening to Bible stories in the car. (The cd linked is awesome, by the way.) Abigail particularly likes to listen to her namesake's story.
- feedback to instructors: on both individual and class performances
something
Next Up: Livwise by Olivia Newton-John
I was the first to wake this morning.
Dear Candidate,
This week, my goal has been to reign myself in again. I want to choose healthy and nutritious foods that are good for both my baby and me. I want to say no to sweets and junk food, which is hard. Just because I am pregnant people think I should be able to eat whatever I want. I believed in this at first, especially for the two months that I was queasy and experiencing morning sickness. What baby wanted, baby got, mostly because nothing else sounded good to eat. However, now that I am feeling so great, I don’t think that means I should eat whatever I want just because I am pregnant.
Photo credit goes to my wonderful husband Eric!! Thanks Bud-E!!
As fate would have it, though, I met up with neighbor and fellow gardener, Shelly Hagan (member of the Dean Street Community Garden in Prospect Heights), who turn me unto a wonderful resource for exotic garden plants. It is the Gowanus Nursery in Red Hood. Located at 45 Summit (Van Brunt and Columbia streets), this nursery offers up a wide variety of unusual annual, perennials, and shrubs that will allow any garden the opportunity to design a sophisticated garden. And similar to the Terminal Market and Home Depot, their pricing fits within the budget.
In the meantime, certain people will undoubtedly encourage Comrade Bout to be more talkative and forthcoming. There will be plenty of time to reflect and reminisce, to chat beside the steaming samovar and recall times gone by. It’s always the little things that count.
After the funeral the church had a dinner for all of the family. The kids (all of the great-grandkids) were all running around playing in the gym after the dinner. It made me smile. I remember all of the Christmas family get togethers we had growing up,running around and playing with all of my cousins. We (myself and my cousins) have all grown up now and most of us have children of our own. It brought happiness to see the kids playing as we did when we were younger.
Well wait a minute… to see the return on these investments, you must sell these stocks for more dollars! Under this premise, if the dollar collapses and you are still living in America, what good will a bunch of dollars do from your short bets? And as for the gold and silver investments advised, what good will gold be if it is valued in dollars? The claim that gold will go up in value to $5,000 is nothing but a very popular and deceiving gimmick. With a theoretical collapsed dollar, $5,000 or $500,000 in gold valued in dollars will be all but worthless in dollars, since the dollar will be worthless.
the shape of needles invades, mingling with the cries of a young child in pain
"I have a press release to get out and then we are interviewing I am afraid." I say trying to sound sincere. Given the choice of spending time with Jay and having my teeth pulled out I am not sure which I'd prefer.
So my guy finally gave me the cliff-notes version of the S.H.I.E.L.D. (Strategic Homeland Intervention, Enforcement and Logistics Division) organization led by Nick Fury (Samuel L. Jackson). I already knew Iron Man and the Hulk, and had figured out that Thor was more than Elisabeth Shue’s friend, but still needed to meet the rest of the team: Captain America.
Monmouthshire County Council (MCC) has agreed to sell the site, and plans a new market 10 miles (16km) away near Raglan. Back in January, the Labour Welsh government rubber stamped MCC’s request to repeal 150-year-old laws requiring it to provide a market in the town centre. MCC which owns the land, backs plans for the replacement and claims the development of the current town centre market site would help regenerate the town.
Security - that'll be the local constabulary. Tough Geordie coppers on tough Geordie horses telling southerners "if yuz tek anuffa sip o' that drink yuz gettin' banged oop". Like I'm dead scared.
1. Gary Oldman, Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy – Gary Oldman tends to go big in most of his roles, but this piece of extremely minimalist acting might be his best to date. George Smiley is mostly a passive character. He observes. He calculates. He takes in information until it is time to use that information. 90% of the performance is in his eyes. His role is perfectly encapsulated in one scene. Smiley and two other spies are in a car. A fly is buzzing around. The two others swat at it to no avail. Smiley just watches it until at just the right moment, he cracks the window and the fly leaves the car.
11. The waiting
It's great to be remembered....just like the Alamo!. :-)
We tried it and it was shared with our friends and neighbors because it looked so good. And what were we going to do with a whole cake for President’s Day?
Almost as light as one of my birds he must have been.
PATTISON PREFERRED'S FLUCTUATIONS.
For a long time, I have been bothered by this vague notion that the fact that I eat meat does not entirely jive with the fact that I am not only an animal lover but one of those people who refuses to even kill a cockroach. This isn't for any religious or ideological reason. It's just that I am a huge softie. I want to adopt all stray dogs. And cats. And some of the squirrels in our local park. Of course I can't do this. I am bound by the necessary constraints of a thing called reality (and the protestations of my incredibly patient husband) which dictate that one large dog within one smallish apartment is quite enough.
If in fact,
Spain is going down the exact same road that Greece went down.
My “cousin” – on the other hand – lives ten minutes away from my parents. She is not really blood related, but she’s closer to me than any blood cousin I have. We’re about the same age and we’ve known each other since birth. She is the daughter of my dad’s oldest and best friend. Her dad passed away and my dad stepped in as a sort of surrogate grandparent to her kids. My mom and dad go over there almost every holiday and a lot of weekends. She raises her kids in her suburban house, ten minutes away from my parents, with her dentist husband. When I think of her, I can’t help, but think this is what my parents wanted for us. Meanwhile, my brother and I live across the country in big urban areas that are supportive of gays. Maybe my parents got the wrong breed.
Any discussion with a journalist on this issue appears to follow this pattern: First, there is outrage that some abstract principle - transparency, press freedom, liberalism - has been violated. After some discussion about particulars, it is generally accepted no principle has been violated, rather that the decision was evidence of poor political judgement on the DA's part. Once it is agreed that, poor or not, that judgement is the DA's alone to make and that the evidence would have to be interrogated to determine its veracity, finally, in some attempt to revert again to principle and avoid that assessment, the action itself is restated in different terms. (One journalist told me, exacerbated, "What the DA did was actually go into their mailing lists and remove a journalist's name!" Correct. That is what we did. Saying it with effect does not invest it with some hitherto unseen motive.)
I'm obviously going with the same theme as last year. Limericks worked out fabulously for me; they were easy to write, and easy to read for those who spared a few moments to pop by and take a look.
Here's my version, of the card.
160. A fun kids party for Casey
Again, nine months later Summer gave birth to another set of twins, Austin Lee and Houston Tee. All seven of the children looked alike, but how could they not? They were sister and brothers, half sisters and half brothers, first cousins, second cousins and third cousins. It wasn’t incest. It was just weird. Travis and Summer stayed together for three years, and Summer got pregnant two more times and gave birth to Connie Ann and Dalen Joseph. “That’s it!” Summer cried after she gave birth to Dalen. “Travis don’t you ever touch me again.” “Women, I want a house full of kids, and you’re my wife. It’s your duty to have babies. That is why God put you on the earth, You have to have my children.” Travis replied. “Someone has been shuckin’ your corn Travis, I’ll have it sewed up before I have anymore kids.” Summer screamed. “Y’all gonna do something. I’m plumb tuckered out! Nine kids is enough!” Travis wasn’t happy with this revelation and demanded sexual relations with his wife every night and Summer kept refusing. After two years of the constant begging for sex, Summer gave into Travis’ demands, and again, she became pregnant. This is when Connie Ellen was born.
Welcome to another Lawn Fawn Inspiration post. Today, we are featuring the new set, Grand Greetings which has big bold sentiments that you will reach for over and over.
The most important question here, apart from all of my uptight ranting, was whether or not the sandwich was any good. It was…it was alright. The pork was juicy enough, the sauce could have used less sugar and more smoke. I didn’t hate it but I didn’t love it. Meh.
One such weekend was spent back in Brno eating platefuls of dumplings and meat with my favourite 'granat' pivo to wash it all down.
No ink marring its beauty,
The House County Affairs Committee will meet Thursday in El Paso, and one of items addressed will be their interim charge to "Conduct a general study of issues facing county jails. The study should include innovative ways to address overcrowding, the impact homelessness has on the county jail population, and recommendations for handling inmates undergoing detoxification and withdrawal from drugs and
Everybody knows that the war is over
An email from the very kind people at Deschutes allowed as the entire stock of CCR was gone and none is even available in their hometown! Never mind that some lucky squirrels managed to get sample sets of both the CCR and the Red Chair to try out. One nice fellow even videotaped his experience and put it on YouTube for the rest of us poor saps to watch. Cruel bugger.
Welcome to the weird and wonderful world of the BAE Systems Annual General Meeting. Shareholders were today welcomed into the Queen Elizabeth II Conference Centre, to be greeted by plush carpets, free coffee and glamorous posters featuring BAE staff saying how great it is to work for one of the world’s largest arms dealers (they don’t quite put it quite like that).
Sappy.
2. Confinement
She said in her book:
We ended the night at The Hub Coffee House & Cafe. While I didn't indulge in any coffee, we winded down, ate cupcakes from The Twisted Sifter and chatted with eachother about our night. We were given goodie bags from Karamel Kreations & Burke's Bakery Delicatessen - and I'm sorry that I don't have any pictures of the contents of the bags - I snacked on the goodies during my hour and a half trip home! I couldn't resist!
I ordered a sample of this off of their website and the colour is spot-on. I love the finish of this foundation (dewy but not oily) and I think it's what MUFE HD foundation should have been. I apply this product with the new MAC 130 brush and a little goes a long way -- I have used the sample at least 3 times a week over the last 4 weeks and still have almost the entire sample left. This photographs beautifully and I'm considering purchasing the full sized bottle after I use up all my other foundations.
Prudence is a rich ugly old maid courted by Incapacity.
All around me
It is difficult to decide which is worse. The absolute corruption in each and every state department in South Africa or the total incompetence of BEE or AA appointees.
I tromped on his head, but it wasn't no use,
Then I went on to the next milonga at El Beso, which is a bit "traditional." It was smaller than I expected, but a beautiful bar inside and with generally beautiful lighting. I was surprised to run into a bunch of Americans there (Avik, Mayumi, Shiztu, David, Lampis), but otherwise most dancers seemed Argentine. I was nervous about doing the cabaceo, and sat around for an hour before I managed to catch anyone's attention. The first person I tried to do it with seemed to assent, but then sat down and looked away. I was just about to get up and so felt really stupid. I kinda preoccupied myself for a while, fiddling with my shoes, and when I looked up again when my ears stopped feeling red, I saw that the same guy was trying to invite me to dance. Boy, was I (pleasantly) surprised! I now think he was just sitting down to wait over the cortina, since the cortinas are long here. Anyway, he turned out to be very nice and we tried to chat in a mix of English and Espanol, and thereafter, it was very easy to get dances, I think I danced every tanda, and had the milonga gone on longer (past 4), there were more guys who seemed interested, too. They all danced milonguero style with tight turns and small steps, a style that I realized I hadn't danced much of for a year, since Robin Thomas days in NYC. I was pleasantly surprised how friendly all the portenos were at El Beso, and how all of them tried to talk to me in English when I said "no hablo espanol", and they also complimented me on my dancing. Very sweet. :) Most of them sounded like regulars who frequent El Beso every night.
A primer on Misha’s charity work up to this point: Right after the earthquake in Haiti, Misha (we’re on a first name basis, but I only call him Mishka in private, FWIW) leveraged the power and pocketbooks of his Twitter followers to raise over $30,000 for UNICEF. Awesome!
Matthew Knight (trombone)
alleged siphoning of over a billion naira by some staffers of the
Clay drew it a year ago.
Nobody arrests Zulus in Africa for speaking the OBVIOUS TRUTH, that Japanese are not Zulus
Got the latest batch of checks that I ordered from our bank, which had changed their name since the last time I ordered. I think some of the data may be wrong, but I'll call them and find out today.
Jacqueline E. Luckett worked in sales for Xerox for twenty years. During that time she married, raised a family, and took creative writing classes where she reignited her love of writing.
It's been a month or even more since my last post.. In case you've been wondering why i've been mia for such a long time.. I've been super mega ultra busy with my new job.. Thought changing job will make me happier but we are not always get what we want, and this is happening on me.. so i just try to do my best and I really hate that i need to hang on my stamps and tools for... errr i'm not so sure until when.. :(
The truth is, the Republicans do not want the poor, the elderly and students to vote, these folks tend to not support the party of the rich. So they crafted a law that will make it more difficult for these people to vote and discourage their participation. And from a position of mathematics the efforts to suppress votes makes sense, while the effort to end voter’s fraud are foolish.
LynneKelly I sure hope @MyPretendDog isn’t chewing on the couch.
* give me a hard time about socializing with my friends or family
Thank you so much for taking on our May's Sketch challenge, the entries were amazingly beautiful and creative.
He was not exactly impressed.
Pour the meat mixture into a baking dish or loaf pan and shape it accordingly. I bake mine in a large, oval, ceramic casserole dish and I form it into an oblong/football shape, making sure not to mound it too high in the center. The more level it is, the more evenly it cooks.
Heartbreak City
11 Contact name at location or name of individual/team in SHU offering work
What if you leave them in school and that ruins their lives? How is that path any safer than the unschooling path, when taking a quick spin on Google will show just how fraught with peril is school?
Contrast. Shannon, Blake’s GF. Total. Babe. Marissa, just a friend and fellow photographer. Shannon loves him; Marissa needs him. How is he supposed to frame them both in one shot?
About 1 minute before the pasta is finished, scoop it out of the water and add it to the pan with the sprouts and beans. Add 1/2 cup of the pasta cooking water and stir to combine. Continue cooking, adding a bit more pasta water if the mixture seems dry, for one more minute. Add the reserved bacon and Guanciale.
Every other day the government seems to regress back to the ’80s. Witness these statements by the Coal Secy who is on the board of Coal India..
The Texas Department of Public Safety led these two boats to the banks of the Rio Bravo to present them to Congress and show their use to patrol the border.Obviously Congress isn't listening. Or anyone else in Washington for that natter.
SPC/PTE not available: China PRC, Hong Kong, India, Indonesia, Malaysia, New Zealand, Pakistan, Philippines, Thailand, Vietnam".Readers of this weblog will already be familiar with the case of Macau (see earlier posts here and here). As for the rest, The SPC Blog will watch carefully for news and developments.
Rinse and Repeat: “I thought you already ran ‘your’ marathon, why would you train to do it again?” I have no idea, but I can’t help myself. You’d think after 2 of our own kids, fostering, and what not, we’d have it out of our system by now, but noooo, we wanted one more.
You haven’t told him? Sonja asks.
I just smiled, then gave merit to her idea of treating myself after a workout. I walked over to a hair dryer....and used it. It's been a good day.
It’s been waiting for a thousand year.
WHY RENT SOMETHING ELSE: The noir tone of the original is sorely missed.
‘In years to come there is going to be information that will come out that Obama was not the man who made the call. He can say he did and the people who really know what happened are inside the Pentagon, are in the military and the military isn’t allowed to speak out against the commander- in-chief so his secret is safe.’
That's why I come here today -- not to talk, but to act.Well, actually, nothing came of the Copenhagen conference. There was no global climate deal. But so what? The point is, the president rubbed shoulders with just about all of world's leaders at the Copenhagen conference -- everyone from Russian President Dmitry Medvedev and Chinese Premier Wen Jiabao to Indian premier Manmohan Singh, Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany, and French President Nicolas Sarkozy. From Copenhagen Obama flew on to Oslo to collect the Nobel Peace Prize and give another speech filled with intimations of his own omniscience.
i began to embrace a different kind of friday night as i pulled into the YMCA.
When the Spirit told Nephi to kill Laban the second time, Nephi remembered that Laban had tried to kill him and his brothers, had stolen their goods, and was in all contexts a wicked and oppressive man. This was enough to legally justify killing the Laban of the past, but Nephi still refused to strike a blow that in cutting against the past, would also cut into the future.
Page, T.N., The Negro: The Southerner's Problem. NY: C. Scribner's Sons, 1904.
First off, ignore the mess on the counter. I know you're looking at that first, so I thought I would just go ahead and say it :)
CONSERVATIVE: pasty pasty pasty busy pasty pasty pasty. Prime MInisterial diary pasty pasty how expected to pasty pasty pasty
~You may flip or rotate the sketch, change or replace the shapes, but please make sure the general layout is recognizable.
Taking up a lot of room
Michael Jude D'Esposito, 32, Morganville, N.J.
Claudia is understanding more, I know she doesn't understand on the grand scheme level, but she knows enough to talk about Curtis and that does help. Today we were at a tea party My Other Blog and were at a table with a few grandmas and their granddaughters. One asked another little girl how many brothers she had. The grandmother said something about her having a brother who died and they are trying to "encourage" her to be aware of him and making sure to mention him.
Description: (Goodreads) Kami Glass loves someone she’s never met . . . a boy she’s talked to in her head ever since she was born. She wasn’t silent about her imaginary friend during her childhood, and is thus a bit of an outsider in her sleepy English town of Sorry-in-the-Vale. Still, Kami hasn’t suffered too much from not fitting in. She has a best friend, runs the school newspaper, and is only occasionally caught talking to herself. Her life is in order, just the way she likes it, despite the voice in her head.
5 cups Amelanchier berries, rinsed and destalked
Thomas Moore
She had been battling Alzheimer’s for quite some time and things had taken a turn. The common thought was, “Granny is now at peace.”
Chances are you've never played a game quite like this. It's nothing if not unique. You play as Wander who travels to a shrine with the intention of reviving a girl. He's instructed by a god-like entity to destroy the sixteen idols that are inside the temple. Each of these idols are represented by colossi scattered throughout the land, and they must all be taken down. The story is not very complicated, but it is very good.
I did get some fun things in the mail this week but I wanted to do an Easter post instead and start back with IMM next week. I work in 911 Dispatch so I don't get all the holidays off. I get Easter off this year and plan to spend it hopping from family member to family member. I hope you all spend the day surrounded by family and friends and not doing much of anything. That's how holidays are supposed to be after all.
And ripe, orange, fleshy mangos from Egypt.
Gouvernement du Québec unconditionally governs the Caisse (the Fund) and owns its investments (An act respecting the Caisse de dépôt et placement du Québec):
The threat does not strike until the user visits particular websites.
Wednesday, 25 April 2012
Total = $16.49
My favorite time of each day is sitting down with my husband to enjoy a home cooked meal. Even though it's just the two of us we set the table each night with place mats, cloth napkins plus add a bit of candlelight for ambiance. Whether we are eating bologna sandwiches or chicken Parmesan - the ritual remains the same. Since we'll be celebrating our 28th wedding anniversary next week maybe some extra candles and mood music will be added too!
When I got finished with this card I was truly surprised at the few supplies that were required. I love how it turned out too! What do you think? Did you make any special projects for Mother's Day?
That brings me to my next thought. I need to keep a handy, easy to read list of my beer selections, for both myself and for you, my loyal readers. I don’t know how I’ll do that although I may just create a post here that I will re-post when I update it. I think that I’ll have an alphabetical list and a favorite list.
But looking over my words I feel a flash back, a recall, a remembrance and a realisation is in order.
I was having a chat to a friend of mine the other night about their house, I have been helping them ramp up the style a bit since they moved in a few months ago. The house is stunning with breath taking views over the ocean, it was their holiday home but why not have that holiday 365 days a year.... so they made the decision to sell up their home close to the city and move to the beach!
What I realized is this….I LOVE my kids with every part of my being! And absence does make the heart grow fonder. It doesn’t always happen while you’re apart. Sometimes it doesn’t happen until you get back together. Even though I wasn’t crying in my coffee cup missing them, being apart refreshed me as a mom. And that in itself, gives me renewed patience and energy for motherhood. It makes me a better mom. Being apart has created in me a desire to spend time with each one of them and brought on extra hugs, surprise lunch visits to school and special book/snuggle time. I may not have missed them while we were apart, but I sure am enjoying reconnecting with them now.
MM APA's moment in the sun is fading, I believe, and they also had its replacement lined up: the new version of Messrs Maguire Porter is a decent and quite dry effort, but not terribly exciting. It probably warrants some closer analysis when it eventually shows up in its home pub.
This just may be my chance… I wonder if I can talk my Chilkoot hiking partner into joining me on this trip as well. I PROMISE I won’t whine as much as I did on that trip… PROMISE!
Here's the letter I got back:
Although we do not see eye-to-eye on matters of blogging, I am confident that their head and heart is in the right place to steer this great blogging nation into prosperity.
She has been doing the sweetest tags, now butterflies, and lavender sachets.
for everything but sleep
It turned out that most respondents described a fairly equal distribution as the ideal – something similar to the wealth distribution in a country like Sweden. They estimated – correctly – that the U.S. has higher levels of wealth inequality. However, they nevertheless grossly underestimated the actual inequality, which is far higher still. Especially the bottom two quintiles are almost non-existent in the actual distribution. There was much more consensus than disagreement across groups from different sides of the political spectrum about this. From the current policy debates one would not have expected that. They go on to ask the question:
I have a little online store called Joyfoolery where I make clothing and accessories for children and their Mums too. Lots of hats, bags and dresses amongst other things. All my items are made from recycled clothing and thrifted materials, I love the idea of making new from old and saving things from landfill.
I did not say that. No one ever really says that.
What issues are important to us and what do we want to do about them?
And live them with love.
516 D-XII/4/1959. “On Plato’s Meno.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program of Liberal Education for Adults, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. See Item B-13 (Projected), above (2004).
And its not you...its me.
Thailand no exception and thus what he says is pretty relevant to Thailand too:
More worrying than this, however, was what else Pandora saw: for the charging dwarves were now flanked on either side by half a dozen heavily armored wights made invisible by magic, as well as the returned vampire spawn–themselves, now accompanied by two others. One was a vampire clad in spiked plate-mail, later to be recognized as a blood knight–a potent undead fighter who favors cursed accouterments–and the other, a vampire proper, which Pandora recognized from when she’d spied upon Lucimar so long ago as one of the individuals seen through the lich’s censer.
Paper crafting is really a family thing for me. My sister and I used to get together once a week to craft, but now she has moved right next door, so it's one big paper party! I can't leave out that my six year old nephew thinks it's really cool to scrapbook with his aunt and mommy! My husband doesn't ever craft with me, but he is my biggest cheerleader, and is always supportive of what I do. We have been married for almost three years. We have a fairytale romance - we knew each other in high school and were friends, but went over 20 years without any contact, and reconnected on Facebook and quickly knew we were meant to be together. I work as a dental hygienist, so creating with paper is always a welcome release!
While I imagine Earls named their beer for its paleness, Ms Ero’s boss, Peter Ash says, “Follow your logic. If they have Alzheimer’s appetizers on the billboard, you’re totally okay with bringing your grandmother there to chow down a plate of Alzheimer’s appetizers.” Well, unfortunately my logic runs a different path from his. If my grandmother had Alzheimer’s she probably wouldn’t care or remember what the appetizers were called. Reminds me of the diner in the US (Heart Attack Grill) that sells Flatliner Fries and Triple Bypass burgers. They’re maybe being honest or are they demeaning people who have had heart attacks?
THE WIZARD OF OZ — WILD AT HEART. This is really too obvious to need elucidating, and besides, the OZ references doubtless originate in Barry Gifford’s source novel. In fact, the Gifford-related movies tend to have more intertextual stuff than the others, however –
I don't know if I've mentioned here how much Abby loves "raking leaves". Every time we go outside lately, she wants to get her gloves and the trash barrel and rake leaves. She usually helps for a few minutes, and then decides she wants to sit in them and spread them around. The kid's probably around 40% help and 60% hindrance. She's so amazing though, that it's easy to forgive her.
Today it also emerged that six other papers had been changed.
1 emptied
The boy reportedly took a bus home himself without informing anyone, prompting a manhunt by the police in the neighborhood. He has been ‘counselled’ for his wrongful act.
The differences can be quite amusing in their weirdness. The older and more obscure version of Cinderella sports a number of unique moments. For instance, she didn’t just have two wicked sister. She had a Cyclops and a Triclops for sisters. The Cinderella character’s name is actually “Two Eyes.” She was very common looking. ;) “Beauty” from Beauty and the Beast, wasn’t an only child taking care of her father. She was the youngest of six children, several of whom are turned to statues by the end of the story.
As we walked back to our house, the heavens opened and the rain poured down. We got to try out our own version of a classic Mythbusters episode: do you get more wet walking or running in the rain? Our conclusion? It makes no difference, we got comprehensively soaked no matter what we did. To finish the day we had pizza in front of the television and watched… well, Mythbusters of course.
Dumas was also a prolific writer of non-fiction. He wrote journal articles on politics and culture, and books on French history.
Games still bulk $50-60, but now there are a lot added of them, and a lot added options in the types of games. A lot of amateur today boilerplate out at about ten hours, accord or yield a few, and a triple-A titles could calmly absorb twenty hours of your added time, or more. An RPG adeptness be accomplished in 60 hours if you're lucky. Some games, in authentic amateur by developers BioWare and Bethesda, avowal over one hundred hours of attainable apple gameplay.
I feel like we have been going non-stop for over a month now, but I really don't have any "proof" that we have been all over town.
Enjoy the match wherever you are watching it. ’til Tomorrow.
1 red bell pepper, seeded and chopped
I did something today that I never thought I could do. I didn’t think I was smart enough, or good enough with numbers, or able to understand the details. I’ve always paid other people good money – in fact, a lot of money – to do it for me. But not this year. Not today.
Eggs, 3 pcs, beaten slightly
You sure do like the dog park
For multinational firms, India and China, the last bastions of growth, are critical markets which need to deliver to make up for sluggish sales in mature markets. Yum Brands’ restaurant sales in China, which accounts for 40% of Yum’s total profits, missed analyst expectations for the January-March 2012 quarter, triggering speculation about a likely slowdown in the country and turning the spotlight on India.
SCHEDULE FOR CLUB INEGALES THIRD SEASON
That's right! We're back! (and Im back too... been WAY too long since my last post... and I have a few cards to show you in the next week or so... so YAY!! I've missed blogging so) Anyhow, I digress from my original point, We have re done the Sketch Blog so it's now a bi weekly challenge blog, sure hope you can play along as the first sketch is a FUN one. But before I get to that... we're HOPPING to celebrate the relaunch, HOPPING to say Hello and Goodbye to some NEW and Retiring CATZ!! And introducing some NEW, But full of the same old 'Tude you're used to, Digi's sentiments from Graphicat Stamps YAY!!! So the start of the hop is....
Other clients of the same underage prostitute include 9 civil servants, a senior banker, a company director, a senior vice-president of a private company, lawyers, a senior police officer, the former principal of Pei Chun Public School Lee Lip Hong and prominent grassroots leader and high-ranking MOE official Chua Ren Cheng. Their ages range from between 21 to 48 years old.
The container is covering the heating vent.
Well here I am FINALLY....seems that time has gone by way to quickly this month...between card groups, "31" parties, working, babysitting...trying to get my Christmas cards done and out and my computer being a real pain I haven't had time to even think (or post)...:(...I haven't had time to stamp or chat with my very special online friends.....and I do so miss them...
13 Caroline Says II
This is also one of the main reasons, no doubt, for the great increase in Negro tenant farmers, especially that of share tenants. The latter class increased about thirty-six per cent between 1900 and 1910. Many of these seldom work a full day at a time. As they usually put off cultivating a crop to the last moment, if a wet season happens to set in, it is soon greatly damaged by a growth of grass. As a tenant farmer, the Negro realizes that he is more independent, his time is his own, and that he can usually work when he pleases. A great part of his time is given to various Negro recreations, such as visiting, riding and driving, crap-shooting, preaching, attending revivals, and camp-meetings. (W.H. Collins, 1918)
The Vicar went on to speculate that there could possibly be folk out there still sporting scar tissue as a result of a tussle with Bob.
pizza sauce of your choice
 Disrupted families and a further reduced White birth rate, which means becoming a further reduced percentage of the population, which means we Whites will soon be reduced to a minority in our own country.
Then I look outside and see your vests flapping against my t-shirts on the washing line, and I remember the lines I wrote you in that e-mail, back before our beginning. I would never have guessed then of the marriage lines we'd share so many years later.
“This is such a special night.”
I smoked, thought: This is it? Here
Excellent digital radio broadcast. Oasis were touring their sixth studio album "Don't Believe the Truth" at this point and this seven-song broadcast contains three songs from that album and earlier tracks.
i dropped him to my dad at a halfway point between the both of us. i then went to whole foods which is a treat for me because we don't have one where we live. when i drove into the parking lot...it all came flooding back to me....
Frankly, when I realised that the latest generation of Kindles were black - sorry, 'graphite' - in colour, I have to admit that I was disappointed. Functionality aside, the white finish of the previous versions appealed to my girly sense of style in a way that the new models just don't. And I say this as someone who bought her first ipod because it was pink and shiny and pretty, not because she wanted to listen to music on it.
Quignogs – Ridiculous notions or conceits.
The Musician Madame.
We are currently hiring for the 2012-2014 school years. To learn more about the program and to access the online application, please click HERE.
Slim, ultra-light design upto 13 hours Taltime
And if only fools are kind Alfie , then I guess it is wise to be cruel
Last night,i n spite of a very damp evening, nearly a thousand people turned up to Belmont Abbey for the famous May procession to honour Mary, the human mother of Our Lord, Jesus Christ. People met at Hedley Lodge, for an
in the country of liberated photostat machines.
11:10 p.m. Where are those Excedrin PM? Surely I have some. I haven’t needed to take these for months, but two diet sodas and a coffee late in the day what was I thinking? call for the big guns so take two.
~A rag rubbing the remaining stuff around on the floor. You want to really spread it around, right?!
a sled to it so her miniature horse can give
Nomads by Nature is hosting this week's Round Up on the very timely theme of Independence Day, which is, of course, the holiday in the middle of next week! And while many of my friends at Embassies and Consulates around the world are frantically preparing for their official celebrations in honor of America's National Day, I am preparing for a relaxing week. Because we celebrated our National Day in March, to avoid the heat and summer slowdown. And right now, I am very thankful for that. All I need to do is show up to our Consulate's unofficial celebration and enjoy myself. No suits or heels or makeup or endless small talk required!
4 – 7 p.m. Original Sin Cider, Sampling in the Beer Department
- November 1977 Swami Prahbhupada dies, Hare Krishna Movement struggles
National police spokesperson Vish Naidoo said that in terms of the Traffic Management Act members of the VIP unit may exceed the speed limit and use their blue and white lights when there justifiable circumstances.
The DVD cover was also designed by me, with very close collaboration with my sister-in-law. It was designed using her font choice, and images from the DVD. IT was definitely an exercise in meeting exactly what the clients wants.
4. Candles are a must have for every home. I received this Voluspa candle as a gift recently and absolutely love the smell and flickering light. There's something about candles that's just so calming, don't you think?
In the end this was a pretty enjoyable Winter Brew and I could see this being a staple for the winter months for the years to come.
HOLY. CRAP.
It was shortly after their ten year anniversary that Michael saw his opportunity. His wife brought him a screwdriver, asking if he'd hang a picture in their bedroom. He took the tool and examined it closely. It was when his wife asked why he was looking at it that his mind crossed that barrier that separates what we want to do and what we do, and he killed her with the screw driver, and then proceeded to hang the picture that she'd asked him to.
Brooklyn Assemblyman Jim Brennan, who chairs the Assembly Committee on Cities, noted that the tax-exempt financing for the Yankees was approved in 2006, then was immediately followed by an Internal Revenue Service statement that the rules would be modified.
5. Others: Journals can be special gifts, but tricky unless you know what the receiver likes..A nice Bundle of Moleskines or Rhodia's or Field Notes would be sweet with a Sarasa or two on top. I could go on and on forever about pen cases, antique ink bottles, pen holders etc. they all are awesome in their own way and can make a great gift.
It is our turn now to do the same. An election outcome will not change that. We are willing to lay down our lives for the cause of liberty if it is required of us and it may be. I welcome losing if the winning team is not supporting the principles this country was founded on.
The woman
How wild man is this film? The original chicken killin' wild man of rock, Screamin' Jay Hawkins (left) is Dolorosa's right hand man! Rosie Perez is Perdiata! Her love story with Dolorosa is muy hermosa! And when they start to sway and bounce to the music of Herb Alpert and the Tijuana Brass as kidnapped white kids freak out in the back, please imagine me when I first saw this scene, rolling on the floor laughing in hysterical delight! And demand they release his previous film, Day of the Beast, a horror comedy too good apparently for American audiences. Che, un re flash balujo tu puta madre!
The Strider SMF flashed, slicing a small nick out of the girl’s ear. The girl let out a squeal of pain as blood ran from her ear down over her face.
You have apparently made allegations of criminal conduct against me.
if you want to order one, you can pick them up locally.
The next day as her mother commenced her daily hair-stylist task, Rapunzel said, “No mom. I want a haircut.”
I won't be printing mine out, because it says there are more than sixteen hundred pages. (There are links on the site to various online printeries.)
What kind of dreams do you have, and how are you fulfilling them?
Meanwhile, Malay pressure group president Ibrahim Ali and the “Melayu Bangkit” rally organiser Gerakan Kebangkitan Rakyat (Gertak) slammed the critics for blowing the issue out of proportion.
A Welsh night out - or "sesh" - cannot whimper away on a wave of "see-yas" or drown in a repeat kebab's chili sauce. It must soar to new heights of purpled-panted passion at the Pontarddulais bus stop, or else vault slag-heaps of convention with a slow-burn scrummage.
or bend in stance,
In the title story, a young monk is sent with some of his brothers to an isolated village in the Alps. He soon encounters a beautiful young girl who is shunned by the villagers because her father is the hangman. The monk thinks this injustice is ungodly, and tries to comfort and protect the young girl but is reprimanded by his superiors. The monk is sent up a mountain to a lonely cottage to search his soul and rethink his attraction to the doomed girl, but his life is set on a tragic course and things don't end up turning out very well for anyone up on that mountain.
We ducked inside the doorway, thunder crashing
In fact, I’m finished. Time to shower and get some shut-eye. Goodnight, everyone!
The seller I bought the lot of vintage catchers from posted a lot of 1951 Bowman cards. It was a decent sized lot and I commented that I'd be interested in the catchers if he didn't get a buyer for the whole lot. He contacted me and offered me 5 of the Bowman cards plus all the other catcher cards you've seen here the last few days. Here are the very first 1951 Bowman cards I've ever touched, much less owned.
Out of nowhere, some random idiot dressed in a rat suit started punching Tom, and since I was right there, I grabbed the moron, pulled him off Tom, and then we were all thrown out. As we were standing outside, we heard threats that the police had been called. We were stared at in the street by these aggressive meat-head mongoloids, but nothing else happened.
“It hurt me very bad, but finally it went out, and I felt like heavy chains had been lifted off me. I haven’t felt this good in a really long time.”
After the links have rested, cut the links into 1 1/2" pieces.
"People Make the World Go Round" is an apt song for this scene. Musically, the song is a dead ringer for a Burt Bacharach-Hal David song -- right down to the tricky rhythm and the sound of the horn section. It's easy to imagine Dionne Warwick singing this song.
Want to offer any advice? Practical. Links, comments, a post of your own and link it back here. I’m all ears. Anything helpful. Thanks!Young Man is currently not-quite-four, so I'm speaking here as a "Remember what it was like to live inside the body of a teenage boy" and also a "terrified on behalf of my daughters" father, since with out oldest two girls at 10 and 8, it's not so many years until I have to start wondering if the boys they play with are learning about women via the nastier portions of the internet. I'm also not entirely sure how this will go over, so I'll give it a shot and see what the reaction is.
11 Little Women – Louisa M Alcott
FinePrint Literary Management
She keeps working my dick
Take the beating of errant wives...... once that was ho-hum,
Where the features of a face are no longer enough to evoke the tired memories of… well, the name escapes him also.
07 - Serge Gainsbourg - Black and White
Of the bags I consistently operate from the second and very heavily relied upon is a Duluth Trading Company's Cab Commander (in tan). If you don't have one buy one. It's stays loaded and in the 4runner with everything from a spare coffee thermos and water bottle, knife, picks, maps, compasses, rain jacket, food and so on. The nice thing aside from being within arms reach. If I switch vehicles it's as simple as grabbing it and go.
Finally, regarding communication in relationships, be conscious of the energy of war in relationships in May. Communicate through your friction points with others only when you absolutely feel you need to, as many of you will be in ‘the flush’ and simply replaying past situations and events in your life.
Aug 27 Dallas, TX (Review by ROBot Girl/LPU)
In Roman mythology, Abundantia brought money and grain to people while they were sleeping; shaking her gifts from the cornucopia she continuously carried.
Prairie Warblers are singing all over the south side of the park in the cedar fields.
LONE STAR (R. Paul Miller and Maggie Renzi, producers)
The Red Sox selected Boyd in the 16th round of the 1980 amateur draft. He made his major-league debut on September 13,1982, and spent a decade on the mound before blood clots in his right arm ended his career.
A general world example: you’ve heard of athletes getting a “signing bonus” when the contract is signed and if Colorado is like other states, the nursing shortage often means that nurses get a “signing bonus” when coming aboard. Also, athletes can get a “performance bonus” if they throw X number of touchdowns in a year or reach a certain RBI level (and folks, I have no clue what the bonuses are in the sports world so I’m just making this up but you get the picture).
Impressive, eh?
The book is interestingly organized. There are chapters on Buttery Cookies, Chocolaty Cookies, Fancy Cookies, Fruity Cookies, Spicy Cookies and Nutty and Seedy Cookies. Readers will find many traditional recipes for Snickerdoodles, Thumbprints, Shortbread and Brownies, but there are many other unusual cookie species to explore as well. I am looking forward to making some delicate Green Tea Cookies and Alfajores (buttery sandwich cookies filled with dulce de leche) in the New Year, for sure!
Psalm 39:4 (New Living Translation)
Well, Jason, it’s now just one game left. I thought we would beat Colchester but I didn’t think we’d make so much hard work of it. I was sat outside a sports bar in Brussels listening to the commentary on the game with a bunch of other Stokies and we were tense. We were all gutted when Hull scored their winner but Stoke could have done no more than win. Now we just have to get a draw at home to Leicester. Will we do it? Yes.
Salamander Energy plc, Natural Gas Production in Thailand, By Fields 18
Stuck in reverse
Dear Hugh
I chose to write reality-based fiction based on moods.
The ribbon roses are from the Hobby House and the flower is by Prima. Hope you'll join us.
Jack wanted some face time on the blog. This picture shows how short (I prefer petite) I really am….Jack is only 7 and he’s gaining on me. For the record, I’m 5’2. I started out the day with ballet flats, but then I went outside and froze my toes off, so I changed to boots. It was 35 degrees today but it’s supposed to be 70 degrees on St. Patrick’s day—God willing!
I added a photo of the desk, in my home, where I work on my fashion blog. The room has a Marie Antoinette/ Victorian style vibe...
The show regained a great deal of popularity when it was released on DVD.
Thank you!!
I was first up, and guess who the first shooter was? That jerk. Now, he may have been a great person in real-life, but several factors during the game decided that he was my number one target. (1) He was wearing a Barcelona jersey (2) he already scored on me and (3) he was a cheap player… This may be soccer, but I think the saying “Three strikes and you’re out” applies here very well.
Manmohan Singh, the presiding judge, was hearing the present case as a civil court and not a writ court. A civil court, hearing a civil suit, cannot stay the operation of a complaint filed under a statutory rule. Only a writ court can stay the operation of such a complaint. Simply put, the presiding judge did not have the power or authority to stay the operation of a complaint under the IPR Import Rules.
Which brings me to my funny story via a sweet kindergarten student in my class. He comes in and says, "Ms. Watts, today's Beaver Day right?" Ha! I'd mentioned Groundhog Day the day before in calendar...he was confused. And being the evil teacher I am, I pretended like I didn't hear him just so I could giggle again when he said it the second time, this time even louder...to which I replied, "You mean Groundhog Day?! It's tomorrow." So cute. Had to share.
Sadly, the national implementation of the 8-hour workday for all citizens wouldn’t occur until the passage of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 under FDR’s New Deal. This piece of legislation was also the first to mandate a Federal minimum wage to check the rampant growth of sweatshop labor in the industrial sector:
“It’s a good sign,” she said. “It means you’re moving closer to delivering the baby."
Working for both festivals, I felt like a kid in the proverbial candy shop. Not only did I get to write and edit in a variety of formats –analytical essays, press releases, scripts, etc.– but also got to watch as many movies as time would allow. Granted, given that both festivals this past year programmed more than 140 films each, there was no way in heaven that I could watch them all. But I saw enough to know that the art of the moving image is alive and well, even with all the changes taking place in the world of filmmaking. On the down side, most of the films I saw will never, ever receive mass distribution in the United States, outside of their eventually being released in DVD or, maybe, through video-on-demand.
On a GOOD note...
I'm Herman Cain! and my candidacy's one offer you simply can’t refu-u-u--u-se!…
I DON'T WANT TO KILL YOU by Dan Wells is A BOOKLIST HORROR TOP TEN for 2011.
This undated entry is from somewhere in the Spring of 2005, when I was living in Thailand. Names have been changed to protect the not-so-innocent.
Tired and worn out from another useless day.
You do not have to pay this immediately, but if your royalties have not covered the returns charges within 3 months, you will have to make the outstanding payment.
To start with, the ward is fantastic! Hugely overwhelming because there are a million people with new ones every week, but the young moms in particular have been so welcoming to me which really means a lot. I had a calling within a month of being here. I feel pretty well integrated already with obviously much more getting to know people to come.
"I give you permission to get some blond foils," She said.
Like government advice on smoking, it is actually true that smoking kills you. For every old timer telling you they smoke 80 woodbines a day and never had a day off sick in their life, the graveyard is full of people not so lucky who are not around to tell you about their health. When the government say “don’t smoke”, they are not actually wrong.
Bake for 12-14 minutes or until golden brown.
You really wow'd us last week with your monochromatic loveliness and
Yes! We must reach the lost (those that are going to hell by the way) No! They will not be inclined to listen to us but that does not negate our duty as ambassadors of the Most High God. And like ambassadors we do NOT have the right to change the message or become like the culture we live in so that we can win that culture. As ambassadors our duty is to deliver a message from the King and that is it. Let’s take a lesson from the failings of the ancient Israelites.
No city aspires to be the “other” city. Especially, a city that offers so much. In the case of Vancouver, Washington, both the city and state are often referred to as the “other.” Vancouver is confused with its much larger metropolitan counterpart about 300 miles north in British Columbia, Canada, and Washington state is often confused with the center of U.S. government nearly 3,000 miles across the country.
Hannah nodded and hung up her white apron on a peg. In the midst of the peaceful, bustling kitchen, Lady MacKennon had no idea what lay in store for her family that very evening and what terrifying changes the rising moon would bring.
Get a great piece of hand stamped jewelry that also helps this family raise the funds they need to adopt! Isn't that great! they are currently 135 on the list of 150 families waiting to adopt from Rwanda.
I'm having a catch-up day, doing those little jobs that have mounted up- so I'll have a little catch-up here too. So what have we been doing? When we haven't been poorly and off school, or flipping pancakes, this week we have mostly been baking,
How can grieving and loss affect job performance?
“It was either Walker or Thompson, I can’t remember which; but I’ll write to my secretary and get the receipt forwarded. He was quite an ignorant fellow, more interested, like myself, in old furniture and books than in pictures.”
Not until you can sign legislation for the LGBT community, as your predecessor President Lyndon B. Johnson did when he signed the Civil Rights Act of 1964 for your community, can you honestly claim that you have met your commitments to us. That requires that you DO for us what President Johnson did for your community. That means that you must take risks, place your comfort and security beneath a real commitment to the ideals you beautifully enunciated as a candidate.
These shoes were last worn here. I got them in October 2008 (on sale) at the Granville Street store in Vancouver. They are the last of the old Listen Up line, with that exact heel. This was a shoe that didn't grab me at all until I put it on, and then I had to have them!
Allie refuses to become Registered. She hates the hunger that plagues her, never knowing when her next meal will come from but she’d rather scavenge than be owned by a Vampire. So when Allie finds a stash of food outside the Wall, she tries to hoard as much as she can only to be attacked by a gang of Rabids. On the verge of death, a strange man gives Allie a choice: to die forever or to die as a human and rise as one of the creatures she’s always despised. A Vampire.
Monster/enemy:
Articulating an experience is not just for students – I try to unpack my experiences, too. As a returning student, I was asked to sit on panels and speak at trustee events, effectively selling the experience of study abroad. Nowadays my means of unpacking often means writing. I have always seen writing as a means of catharsis, as evidenced by this blog and the host of notebooks, napkins and journals that line my travel bag.
The pixel density is virtually identical – 306ppi vs. 312ppi – but if you consider the subpixel density – 612 vs. 936 – the difference seems bigger. The reason for that is Super AMOLED technology uses a PenTile matrix with two – not three – subpixels per pixel.
When the CDF tried to suppress Sister Jeannine Gramick, New Ways Ministry’s co-founder, by telling her that she could not do pastoral work with lesbian/gay people and that she could not speak about the Vatican’s investigation of her ministry, she responded with a simple statement filled with eloquent courage, “I choose not to participate in my own oppression.”
Thus, to say that I was a very receptive audience for Saladin Ahmed's debut novel, Throne of the Crescent Moon is a bit of an understatement, especially as last year's Desert of Souls had already whetted my appetite for more Arabian fantasies. Now, I don't want to compare the two novels, since they're actually quite different from one another, but there are two aspects that are similar enough to warrant comment. First, each novel focuses on an adventurous duo whose association reminds one of Fafhrd and the Gray Mouser, though, in the case of The Throne of the Crescent Moon, the duo eventually becomes a trio. Second, each novel is, by the standards of contemporary fantasy, quite short, with Ahmed's novel being a delightfully slim 274 pages.
On the same day we were moving and the first night we stayed in our new house, I was at the dentist office with H & M for their check-ups and my MIL had A... I got a phone call that A had fell and hit her head on a table and needed stitches. Apparently she was outside playing with my brother-in-laws and just tripped (what can I say? My kids are ALL clumsy like me!), so my BIL, TJ, took her inside to my MIL and was looking at the gash in her head and HE passed out and hit the floor because it was so bad! :( So my MIL brought her to me at the dentist and my mom came to the dentist to finish up H & M's appointments. My poor baby had to get three stitches. It was HORRIBLE! They had to strap her down to a board so she'd stay still. I cried like a baby. Here's a few pics of her before her stitches, then at the hospital a few days later when they were getting ready to cut them out :)
LC
*Laura Numeroff
“Lord, teach us to pray just as John taught his disciples.”
The Army begged the Times not to publish the photos because of the danger it could incite violence against our warriors an dcivilians still in the country, but that wasn't of the least concern to the L.A. Times.
Last month, I sold discounted Clearance WIP Kits to raise funds for the local elementary school. I deemed it the "Face lift Fund" because my intent is to perk up the building and INSPIRE the students and staff who live a lot of their days there. A HUGE THANK YOU to everyone who participated!! Here is what I did with the money...
Vitamin C – in excess – is also attributed to:
Reason 1: The Google audience / user base has traditionally catered to technical audiences and more importantly, to Internet savvy users.
Written originally as a parody of the slasher genre by feminist author Rita Mae Brown, but ultimately filmed in all seriousness, The Slumber Party Massacre is the gift that keeps on giving. I don’t really need to say any more than; boobies, drills, blood and phallic imagery. It like the horror fan’s Christmas all wrapped up in a big blood stained bow, with a free pizza delivery thrown in. While as a woman maybe I’d have liked it to have been the fully realised feminist parody it could have been, and it does have its moments, as a horror fan I just love it regardless.
This is Hobart Cavanaugh as two-bit crook Petty Louie! Hobart was in 190 films from 1928 until 1950, the year of his death! Here's just a couple of samples, "The Mayor Of Hell," "The Devil's Mate," "I Am A Thief," and "The Ghost Comes Home!" What a great character guy!
I'd better behave if I touch a beehive.
That worries me of course: Does it mean I feel immune from criticism? No. I hope not. It's because what I get back is so contradictory and based on the personal preferences of the students, I'm genuinely not sure what to do with it.
Later, he named the sky Miss Lonely Hearts.
to raise awareness and funds for Heifer International.
Fiction doesn't have to shed light on anything real or espouse any message yet we can fall into the trap of thinking that it is. We think that what a film shows it condones because the director has the power of Gods to intervene and make right. We think of a film as presenting an enclosed view of a subject, a last word that relies on
Ingred.
This weekend we've been invited to my MIL's for couscous (COUSCOUS!!!), which I adore, obviously! Hey, maybe I need to get over there early and jot down the recipe!
Immigration
WW: Agreed, anything worth having is worth working for. Do you have any advice on how to publicise self-published ebooks? (Or how to publicise anything!) Your blog has a huge following. What advice would you give to writers who are trying to build up their own following on blogs or twitter or other networks?
of the highest incidences of
Here's the greatest benefit of teleological fiction: because it is the retelling of history as a story, it usually has good guys and bad guys, righteous goals and cruel interdictions, and as such it gives readers a crystal clear view of how the author wishes history to be told. Undoubtably, Leon Uris desperately believes and wishes to pursuade others that the State of Israel was born of justice and mercy by heroes glorious and valiant and virtuous, opposed by foes diabolically opposed to the path of truth and righteousness. Uris feels a need for this story to be told, and we must then ask ourselves what need this story satisfies. Perhaps Uris, swayed by the romance of his own creation, feared that the state of Israel couldn't preserve its virgin-white image, and so wrote this as an attempt to make up peoples' minds before the historians got to them. Who knows?
BF: Oh yeah.
There was a summer kitchen at the back of the house with a small electric stove on which my father hoisted a big steel pot to cook the lobsters. I stayed to help him and my grandfather until the claws scratching at the inside of the pot made me shiver.
A vibrant social justice movement within African civil society is working to ensure the visibility of – and enjoyment of rights by – LGBTI people. This movement is made up of people from all walks of life, both identifying and non-identifying as part of the LGBTI community. It has been working through a number of strategies to entrench LGBTI issues into broader civil society issues, to shift the same-sex sexuality discourse from the morality debate to a human rights debate, and to build relationships with governments for greater protection of LGBTI people. These objectives cannot be met when donor countries threaten to withhold aid.
Amar Patel contacted me to say that he’d recently started working from home and was increasingly working on the road. He’d been apprehensive about moving away from the office and had found my blog useful when trying to ‘normalise’ himself with the new way of working. He wanted to share some tips that he’s found had really worked for him.
1 teaspoon kosher salt
Acrimony over school funding played out Tuesday in controversy over the MEA's Facebook page and its image of Snyder with satanic stars, red eyes and blood spatter. The photo appeared to have been posted on March 11, according to Michigan Capitol Confidential, an online news agency run by the Mackinac Center for Public Policy, a conservative think tank.
You’re over your last relationship. Your signs that anger and resentment have to be gone and you have to have forgiven not only your ex-partner, but yourself. To be angry at yourself is a clear sign that you are not ready to move forward. If you cannot accept where you are and who you are right now, then it’s time to make a change. You will know that you are ready to go out there and date again when you have given up your “story” and can think about your ex with neutrality, compassion, and understanding.
The first victims were either black or Muslim, so the killer must be a white man. The latest victims were Jewish, so it stood to reason, they insisted, that the killer was a Nazi.
This paper addresses this issue by providing frameworks to make the right choices when using a task based approach. Three kinds of choice situations are examined and directions are proposed. The first is the choice of market research techniques to identify tasks and customers. The second is about choosing which parameters to change when the current business approach is not working well. The third situation looks at the choice of marketing strategies to implement when a product is launched. The aim is to provide a blueprint that will encourage companies to focus on the tasks customers want to fulfill rather than just what they say, thereby increasing the success rate of their innovations and creating differentiated products and services that provide a substantial return on investment.
The one drank with friends.
With love, Sandra xxx
Yeah you and I will be a tough act to follow
